This is a fascinating book, thoroughly real, intelligently written, and as candid as you could possibly want a memoir to be. It’s given me a great deal to think about, in part because of my own long-ago struggle, in part because of what’s going on in my diet and life now, and in part because it’s just a doggone incredible piece of work.
Saturday - 6/4 - Bloomington Craft Beer Festival - Tickets on sale Monday.
In the last twelve months I cannot pick up a newspaper or read an article online in the financial press that doesn’t focus on fees. The point they make is simple, if you lower your fees your returns will be better so buy low-cost index funds or ETF’s.
Then add the mango puree and boil this mixture for just a few minutes...
God appreciated Brandon’s birthday too, and he sent a double rainbow to celebrate! We’ve been having unseasonably warm weather here, but I’m totally not complaining. Bring on the sunshine!
My overwhelming sense was one of privilege to be part of such an important project. Amazed at the fast-filling auditorium, the simultaneous Greek-English translation preparations - ear-pieces just as if it was a United Nations meeting...
The BBC having him on as a newspaper reviewer is equivalent to it having Nick Griffin or even a outright Nazi on. But Leftist and Islamist extremists are OK for the BBC. Not so if you are extreme but on the Right. You see even though Leftists are extreme, ‘their hearts are in the right place’ (as one Bradford Anglican minister said about UAF’s Weyman Bennett). As for Islamists like Hasan, they are Brown and Exotic. And that really excites BBC producers and other left-liberals. Dinner party material!
The theme for this month’s Crazy Cooking Challenge was fudge, which was perfectly timed since I had to make Christmas candy for one of our church ministries.
New Lotto 649 Prediction Method (Excel Program File)
DT weeks are the first Saturday of each month, when it's your turn, we want you to make your own sketch for the challenge, arrange a sponsor, and arrange the guest designer (GD) too. You will be expected to type up the post for this week.
We’re all getting a little tired of the GOP, that bastion of cloth coats and smarmy pseudo-religious types, as they advise the rest of us how we ought to think, and what we ought to be up in arms about. It’s been particularly hard to hear that drivel from the mouth of a serial philanderer; from a man who would like to enter the bedroom of every woman in the US, to make sure she’s following his rules; and from someone who changes position with each puff of . . . wind, of course it’s wind.
As a facilitator the RM's goal is to provide the drive towards a timely release. The RM works here as a liaison between different contributors, committers, Project Management Committee (PMC), and other projects to guarantee the smooth delivery of a release. Normally this process starts by the RM sending out a proposal to the project developers requesting that a release be cut at some up coming date. When a release candidate is prepared the RM will then hold a vote for project members to ratify the release.
Btw-- in case you can't tell from my "Hipstamatic" photos-- I got an IPhone for Christmas! It's a huge step up from the archaic flip-phone that I formerly used. . . I'm so excited!
Being a man of modest education and having, at best, a tenuous grasp of Shakespeare, I began my preparatory work last week. If I don’t conduct my due diligence I’ll be lost by the end of Act I, Scene II. Many plot points hinge on events that occurred in previous plays.
The findings make uncomfortable reading for the UK government who – despite their public condemnation of such practices – are revealed as complicit in war crimes like kidnap, secret detention, and torture.
Thanks for visiting. Your comments make my day!
My boyfriend has recently developed a habit which, having discussed the matter with other females, I believe is quite common among the male species. Each time we go out together, he accumulates a handful of random crap which, without fail, he will ask to deposit in my sacred handbag.
Papers: Bazzill cardstock, Neenah cardstock
My Favourites are...
Good Burp is run by another beer blogger in the Phoenix area and here you’ll get a good notion of what makes a beer drinker and blogger tick. G.B. isn’t afraid to pull any punches when pointing out poor service at a booze retailer or sampling stinky beer. G.B. is another blogger who I'll likely be asking for a guest post if the current polling numbers continue trending the way they are at the moment.
Ernest Alikakos, 43, New York, N.Y.
1/4 tspn Turmeric powder
Do not, do not, DO NOT focus on the overall goal, it will only frustrate and overwhelm you. Baby steps. If you want to write a book, that’s great. A person can only read one page at a time, so why not write the same way. It’s good to have a plan, but in the early stages of writing, it’s not that big a deal. Channel your energy on the little things and it will build into something bigger. If you write three pages a day, every day, you will have a 300+ page book in 4 months. Imagine what you can do with the rest of the year.
Which is exactly what I am trying to say here. That pistol you spent a fortune on, all that training at Blackwater and Gunsite and your IPSC titles will not save you if you believe that weapon skills and that magic talisman are all that you are ever going to need. Defensive tactics are layered. If you are able to avoid the situation entirely through wise choices then do so. If you are alert enough to see trouble starting ahead of time you can engage at as far a range as possible and from cover. If you are cornered and can see that trouble is coming you need skill sets to cover that and if you are caught flat footed at close range, you better have the unarmed skills to prevail.
For a chance to win a $500 Alice Allowance you must visit radioalice.com and become an Alice Rewards member by filling out the required membership application. No purchase necessary. Then, enter your name on the ALICE ALLOWANCE official entry page and listen to Alice @ 97.3 weekdays at 810, 12:10 and 5:10. When you hear your name, you have 10 minutes to call 1-800-400-FM97 to claim your prize. The station will award up to $10,000 a month (20 winners per month). Once the station gets 20 winners, the contest ends for that month. Must be 18 or older. Prize non-transferable and not redeemable for cash. You can only win a prize from Alice once every 60 days. Official rules
Auras in Zentangle are a repeated outline around a pattern. While these are often used to great effect and can fill a space nicely, I don't really use them unless a pattern has an aura in the design. At first I thought about taking a pattern that doesn't usually have an aura and adding one on to it. But then I thought that I'd use Opus and Flux, two patterns that often have auras but are patterns that I don't normally use.
This project will look at DNA from museum specimens of extinct birds (including the passenger pigeon and the ivory-billed woodpecker, as well as two other species) to determine exactly when these populations began to decline and if habitat loss played a role in their extinctions. It costs $2,000 to sample enough birds to analyze one species. They are asking for $2,000, but they need $8,000 to study all four species listed in the project description. There are less than two months left to fund this project.
The girl’s heart sank. She knew
The forecast doesn’t look too bad, either! Maybe we’ll have a chance to go on a nice walk, and I’ve been wanting to take Sophie to check out Eagle Run Park, here in town.
But I eventually convinced her to go out with me…or rather, I convinced her friend to convince her to go out with me. She did not agree outright but one hour later, I found myself with her in the car discussing favourite condom brands. She prefers one of the local brands, ati ni nzuri kwa sababu ina mafuta. (sio Trust daddy…najua unachekacheka tu hapo…). I always use imported condom brands lakini tonight it appears nimepatikana.
It won't be as pretty. Word documents lack the homespun look of a Steiner notebook.Still, I hope it will be a guide for me, as I head into the second half of my home educating career. And pretty or not, something to look back on at the next crossroads and to gain reassurance from. To see goals, ideas, philosophies all met, despite my imperfections and mistakes; to know the path leads to the desired destination, even with its detours and sometimes, its dead ends.
Am I breathing? I think I'm breathing.
always-remember-we-were-so-
14. Destiny 5.08 (54/20)
Marcus Allbäck was my favorite player in the PSP game "Winning Eleven".
Terror on my face, as we said hi,
Instead of calling Jackson off, Grosso got right in Luna’s face. “Watch how you talk to me, witch.” He was so close to her nose that Luna could smell a hint of mint losing the battle against Grosso’s rotten breath. “The last time I checked only Pre-Chaos Police could label an incident as a crime. Am I right or am I right?”
Usually I love reading and research, but I was surprised to find that pregnancy guide books made me anxious. Most of the books I flipped through seemed biased toward natural childbirth (and I knew I'd probably want an epidural) or unnecessarily scary ("What can go wrong during your fifth month? Let's discuss!"). So, I just stopped reading them, which felt super bold at the time! Instead, I followed my doctor's instructions (no wine, no hot tubs, etc.) and then followed my natural instincts. It was great to listen to my body for cues about eating and sleeping, use common sense, and try to trust that everything would be fine. If I had specific questions, I'd ask my friends, my mom or my doctor. (Did you find a pregnancy book you liked, though? If so, I'd love to hear...)
Amazon Associate link:
but it is my routine
In the space of 4 minutes and 6 seconds, a seemingly innocent man is perceived of guilt by three people. And, as we discover (the film's title is still a giveaway), perceptions can be wrong and eventually damaging. Manny is an innocent man accused of robbery, simply because he was seen from the wrong angle.
Estimate $1,500-2,500
"Overdramatic chipmunk" - Dramatic chipmunk just isn't enough.
Despite the outbreak of sunshine here, I have to confess that the reading I do – to keep my finger on the pulse of tech – has been quite discouraging. And that has been true for several years now. Just from what landed in my Inbox today, I could post two dozen articles that (I am pretty sure) would discourage you, too. Such as:
Don't have certain thing going on for an inspiration. Maybe something comes into my mind and the sounds are like connected to that.
2 large onions peeled and roughly chopped
1 c. sour cream
I do have it on good authority that Chris Cleave’s previous novel Incendiary is much better than this novel, but to be honest I don’t think I’ll be reading anything from him anytime soon. If you are after an easy read for the beach with a bit more plot than your average chick-lit then I’m sure you will enjoy it. But if literary fiction is more your thing then definitely stay away from this!
Now, starting a creative blog is WORK. Everyday you need to think of a new and hopefully amusing or at least touching story or idea. Some of the time, I hit it. A lot of the time I don’t. In those moments when I don’t, I wish I had a food blog.
Currently Bensley is reportedly being held in the Galveston County Jail on a charge of home burglary with intent to commit a felony. Hopefully his next stop will be a nice padded room in the local psychiatric hospital…
My sister called a few minutes later and also tried to make me feel better. "I saw your pictures on Facebook, and it looked like you had fun!" "It was awful! I hate everything! And life! And baby Jesus! And also I'm bleeding from the vagina and I can't even change my tampon and I hate everything, including fluffy baby animals and ice cream and happiness! Wahhhhhhhhh!"
He accuses libertarians of fetishising the market, and insists (rightly) that the market serves the people and not the other way around, and that the free market only has value to the extent that it distributes goods and services efficiently. A libertarian might want to interject that the market is merely the economic expression of human freedom, but for Gray, human freedom is a meaningless concept without the institutions that support and maintain the choices that make freedom possible.
Jack Idema, General Partner, Ultimate Pet Resort
This is the end of the world, and nobody knows anything about it at all.
You go ahead, let your hair down
Official stats:
“I’ve lived too long”, he remarked to his daughter recently – a tacit acceptance of his realization that his brain is declining more rapidly than his body. All we can do is watch as the inevitable unfolds and prepare what we can; what he will allow. All that he was is in the past; he has no future – and sadly, he knows this as well.
For me, this was the most powerful revelation of the radio show. I asked Shanti how to start a mindfulness practice. She recommended that you commit to finding small moments, like when you are brushing your teeth, to just be present. I laughed a little and explained that those of us with ADHD often struggle to remember where we left our keys or what day it is, how could we possibly remember that we committed to being present. Her recommendation, using things like a stop light or stop sign to remind you to stop and ground yourself in the present, was a light bulb coming to life moment for me. This is a great idea for creating a natural trigger for many things in our ADHD lives.
For example, losing Hubby has taught me that my grief is my own. No one knows how I feel or what I should feel. I can't even tell myself how to feel. The pain is raw and it goes with me 24/7.
* All this research and I know I’m going to get a big no from Jon, but I had to share this great find with all of you!
Friday night we attended the rehearsal dinner for our good friends. Christopher was in the wedding. I, being the idiot that I am, ate too much food. And we stayed up a little later than we should have. And I was definitely feeling the effects of both choices Saturday morning. My stomach felt gross and I was so tired. I definitely had to force myself to each a piece of peanut butter toast in the morning.
Toby Hadoke: I hate today, unbelievable. My eyes are stinging with tears. My children will be devastated tomorrow. By God she was good. RIP Lis Sladen.
It wasn’t always like this. In 2005 when I started work on mental health issues, 100% of people detained under the Mental Health Act went to police custody as a place of safety for the want of any other options. This was not without consequence and not without cost – measure in many different ways.
We've also now made a resolutions that we're going to make a special effort to meet up more regularly - especially now Georgina is home, and Lorna is finished travelling.
Historically, it has always been difficult to open up and reform. The country can move towards a bright future only after it has passed through the task. — mysinchew
I use Faber Castell's Pencils and fade them with water and brush.
Braden is investigating one of the many aspects of aerospace engineering. It’s a field aimed at deepening our exploration of the skies and what’s beyond our atmosphere focusing on the design and construction of aircraft and spacecraft. There are two basic areas of aerospace: aeronautics (our skies) and astronautics (outer space, also known as “rocket science”). Within these two areas are many different groups of study including design, construction, aerodynamics, controls and properties.
Got them done yesterday for the first time in my life~
An “intelligence asset”, namely an instrument of the CIA used to justify the “Global War on Terrorism”.
We made our way home. They went in the house and I had a mini meltdown in the van.
They had so many different chocolates to choose from, and very few handed out samples so we each just found a couple, but my favorite kind was Pompelmo Rosa in Dolce Moscata. It was a citrus flavor- kind-of like grapefruit, but a bit sweeter.
Once a high man on the totem pole of the Democratic party, the former senator sent his political career down in huge, fiery flames due to his affair with a videographer on his staff named Rielle Hunter.
The car slides silently along the quai, past the Statue of Liberty on Ile de la Cygne, past the high-rise apartments across the Seine in the 15th. "How can I ever replace this?" I wonder. Even the mundane modern buildings take on importance. Suddenly the Eiffel Tower surges into sight; its brilliant blue lighting is breathtaking. For a brief moment I consider asking the driver to stop so I can take a photo, but it's too cold, I'm too tired, and I would have no way to upload it when I get home, because there is nothing left in the apartment.
"The real shame, in my humble opinion, is for a man to have to live with shame discreetly and let it eat up at him. And to allow it and its consequences to harm his life and others'.
To celebrate my latest milestone the give away is one of my handmade, one of a kind pendants. You can guarantee that there will never be another one exactly the same :)
The path to her is fractal music play
Cut up denim for a rag-rug. Which never made it out of the carrier bag. You cut/rip into strips and braid together. Then you wind into a cartwheel and stitch in place. Yeah, that's the THEORY. Again, this is a 1990s project, I'm sure.
Once I had come home and unburdened myself, it was all I could do to restrain myself from turning right back around and returning to the treasure trove! But I thought I had better take some time to soak it all in, share the story with you, and then nose around the next time I am in the market to see if there is anything left we could look through. Even if he does manage to off-load everything else, I'm confident we made judicious choices and won't regret anything we left behind.
So, there you have it! Blog away while becoming smarter, prettier, and less awkward. Personally, I enjoy being awkward (creepy) sometimes. It creates fun stories for later.
Stewart Rayner (Com Gp) 176
“Zeph? Zephyr? Was Zeph here? I’m fine,” I replied.
I'm wanting to help others feel as great as I do. These products make you feel great.
While rail transport and rail maintenance used to be in the same hand, now the railway corporation and ProRail started to work separately from, often against, each other.
Lead in to Global’s 16 X 9 program below from the website:
Hebrews 4:16
Spread pumpernickel bread pieces out on a cookie sheet. Bake, stirring once, for 10 minutes or until toasted on all edges.
dont
I didn’t always appreciate this fact. When I began the fieldwork that led to Migrants and Strangers in an African City a decade ago, my approach was centered on a specific, geographically situated community 160 km north of Bamako. I call this community “Togotala” in the book, using a pseudonym. A decade ago, I tended to think of human communities in terms of points on a map. It was the time I spent in Togotala and with Togotalan people elsewhere (in Bamako, in New York, and later in Brazzaville) that helped me realize just how misleading the place-bound concept of community can be.
You want to know what went wrong, and why…
Untitled
And so goes (to no surprise) the conversation we had a week or so ago:
Faint strains of Frank Sinatra waft through the air from a neighboring yard as I preside over the family grill. A feeling of nostalgia washes over me.
Tea Filter, easy to use, easy to clean. Unique and modern design for tea drinkers. No more rust left like traditional metal tea strainers. Clip it on to your cup at your convenience. Compact size and easy to use.
our lives worth fighting for
- Add the slug of brandy to the biscuits and allow to soak for 10 minutes
Miami Beach, FL 33139-2916
Till we meet again.Take care of yourself.Get well soon to all my friends that aren't well. Seems to be the season for fever,cold and chicken pox and whatnot.
But when I'm not being distracted by puking 4-year-olds, everything under the sun seems to pop up in my head when I'm trying to go to bed.
JCK would like to point out that the amount of excess verbiage her children are exposed to these days is in the extreme. One can be watching "How it's Made" , and during a commercial break get advice on how "to make it." Yes, you no longer have to suffer if you just take this pill. You, too, will once again be enjoying life in an upperwardly mobile ...direction.
But, i cant buy anything til i get more money :(
As the train emerged from the tunnel and back into France, my telephone beeped with several messages. Le FP had been trying to contact me, and had ultimately caved in and left me a message. Suffice to say that he doesn't 'do' voicemail. He believes that other people are there to take messages for him, so why should he do so himself. God help me.
I have plenty to bitch about.
- Anyone who holds certain old UK life-assurance based investments that are “written in trust”
Try examining some of the things you believe in and I’ll bet you come up with a bunch of stuff that you can’t even remember where you got it from. Beliefs you’ve never examined or tested against yourself because you just assumed they were true. Investigate those beliefs with the intention of dumping the ones that don’t hold water with you. You will clear up your personal reality and get rid of hang-ups.
Mashed Pooh head for sale, anyone? Anyone?
It is really quite cool
Toward that end, an interesting book was recently re-published by Verso as part of its “Radical Thinkers” series. Anti-Systemic Movements, by Giovanni Arrighi, Terence K. Hopkins and Immanuel Wallerstein was originally written in 1989, just before the Soviet communist bloc began to collapse, and although the book is to a small extent an artifact of the Cold War era, it nonetheless — because the authors presented a long perspective — a valuable starting point for thinking about the types of movements necessary today to overcome the massive problems of the contemporary capitalist system.
Building Strategies for Collective Liberation
I'm going to leave you with a promise to come by and visit with you soon. I have gotten to some folks this week, but am still working on visiting all my regulars. I'm sorry, that I have been MIA. You mean a lot to me and I miss seeing what everyone is up to, especially at this, my favorite time of year.
for the attention of the
Tomodachi ga Sukunai: 322
I suspected that a boulder I observed, rounded by wind and rain and shaped like a head, which lay half buried in the earth near a temple in the oldest part of Kathmandu was all that remained of a statue erected long ago in Chhepu’s honour. Considered one of the bravest and most truthful of all creatures, his image can often be found above the main entrances of temples and shrines as a guardian against all things evil.
In the instance of Mary McArdle, it’s pretty clear that that precept wasn’t kept to. The appointment was a hurtful and unnecessary reminder of a terrible crime and it seemed, to many people, like a reward for an act of violence.
There was a very distinct smell in my granny's house, similar to how marrowfat peas smell before they have been heated up.
Today, in the here and now, the Republican Party supports individual freedom to a much greater extent than the modern Democratic Party. But casting the Democrats as "the Party of Slavery" is unethical, inaccurate and unfair. Slavery was an American institution, not a Southern one, one in which the North was both foundational and highly responsible. The Republican Party was a sectional party, representing the interests of the North; as such, they were highly antagonistic to the South and anxious to keep their high tariffs in place, which fell most heavily on the South, for the benefit of the North.
A Border Agency spokesperson said the initiative is aimed at promoting legal migration routes in the Schengen area of the EU which the UK opted out of. The area includes most but not all member states.
But wait! There’s more!
I love Christmas.
Wanda Anita Green, 49, Linden, N.J.
But I FIND MYSELF this morning in San Francisco, California. We flew in last night and after making sure the baby was with Grandma, the wife and I grabbed another friend of ours and hit the damn streets. I left my notebook at home but my wife brought her ipad, and I just took my notes on that. As I sit here, I can clearly see that the wife got up this morning and took her IPAD with her to her conference today, which means I don't have my notes.
*Contact editor with a requested story idea for an anthology.
“The source noted that mudslides had hit a number of other districts in Khatlon as well. Thus, seven residential buildings were damaged in the village of Pakhtakor in the Jilikul district; four of them were destroyed completely. Mudslides also demolished 50 hectares of cotton fields in the Panj district, damaged the section of the road Qurghon Teppa-Panj near the village of Somoni and partially damaged eight residential buildings in the Qumsangir district.”
first violets —
I can't remember if I ever showed my husbands drawers, but he still has one completely empty drawer and matched white sock drawer! The other ones are in good shape and my drawers are also in the same condition since day 6....except I was able to match up a few more socks since I have been tackling the laundry since Day 10!
I suppose one fundamental question here might be: Do architects need less regulation in order to pursue the art of spatial design – or simply more creative rules?
Dear Cambodian Ladies,
Conquest of the Pole is bonkers, like most things Georges Méliès filmed in his near-20-year career. It may also be his most complex work. But it has a tragic tone, at least if you know its place in the master's canon. Only a year after it debuted, Méliès was finished. Bankrupted. The victim of pirates less fantastical than his films would have made them. Conquest of the Pole was one of his last major achievements.
I love flowers, I always have. I took a horticulture course in college just so I could have a fresh flower arrangement in my apartment each week. I'm such a sucker for them.
She does get a taste from time to time, and so far she’s very polite (when she loses patience she only puts her front paws on his lap. Nothing further). It’s hard to resist when she looks at you with such bright eyes!
For a while, when I saw the mini-version of some of Tim's dies, I was thinking "so?" But now I get it. TAGS! CARDS! ATC's! and other cool stuff!
But a buck? You gotta be kidding me! It’s almost like the college enrollment gods were smiling upon this road-weary mother about to lose her first-born to adulthood and craving comfort of any sort.
But one realization he only partially makes, one of his most important realizations, is who is to blame. I say partially, because Wilde blames many people – Bosie, Bosie’s father, and himself. And while this letter’s intent appears blaming in nature, or even self-justifying, I think his intent is merely to erase blindness – to shatter Bosie’s vanity so Bosie and Wilde can see themselves clearly.
Please feel free to forward this mail to any of your friends or colleagues who may be interested in this position.
However, I’m beginning to see some ‘superstars’ emerge. Remember, the below stats are only for ‘best novel’ or ‘best book’ wins, only for a small set of awards, and I haven’t finished collating them yet. Take it with a grain of salt.
H.H. Movement is starting now in favour of immign. from Barbados.
I can guarantee that in many cases, if not most, people who get that answer were either not expecting it or not prepared for it. Standard answers for this question range from “The Middle East” to “Jordan”, “Egypt”, “Lebanon”, and the occasional “Los Angeles”. After spending the better part of my life dancing around the answer, I now feel entitled to say it like it is. I deserve to be able to lay claim to that part of my identity without shame, without hesitancy, and without apprehension.
But when the markets are in a mood to think the best of a disaster, it’s amazing how much excrement you can chuck at them before they decide it tastes bad. Spain’s statistics bureau said last Friday that the country’s jobless rate rose to 24.4% in the first quarter, from 22.9% in the fourth quarter of last year; but because the recession forecast was pessimistic by 0.1%, European stocks rose.
To make Filling: Mix butter, brown sugar and cinnamon. Put filling into a zip loc bag and set aside.You do not want this to get too liquidy. About the consistency of toothpaste. If it gets too hard, you can microwave it for a few seconds.
It would also be unrealistic.
Evening work: increase risk of spontaneous abortion (Infante-Rivald et al., 1993)
I'm a little of the same, although, I've never really been a secret keeper, Chamille is really showing me how to do that better.
The traditional answer to the identity of the opponents of Paul is that they are Jewish Christians that desire to impose the law on Gentile converts – Judaizers. The term appears in the New Testament only in Gal 2:14 (although a form appears in but is found in a number of secular sources (Plutarch, Cicero 7:6; Josephus JW 2.17.10; Ignatius, Magn 10.3) with the basic meaning of “to live as a Jew in accordance with Jewish customs.”
She needs the money and has few other immediate employment options. With a steady income Isabella hires a private detective and together they hunt Richard down. When she learns he is now married, her plans change. Consumed with bitterness that his life seems so perfect, she sets about destroying his marriage first. She surprises herself at the joy she feels in succeeding.
I smelt the alcohol in his breath but, there was really no need to be scared…or was there?
One of my favorite members of this genus is the fragrant ladies’-tresses (Spiranthes odorata) and this past Wednesday (11/16) I encountered a flowering colony of them in the flooded prairies of Everglades National Park, where I’ve seen them each Fall over the past two decades. The species name, odorata, refers to the intensely fragrant flowers, so it’s very worthwhile to get your feet wet to get a whiff of the perfume that emanates from the flowers. It’s quite intoxicating.
One pundit observed this morning on Breakfast telly, slightly tongue in cheek, that Lib Dems should be gratified to be in a position after so long whereby they finally get to be on the receiving end of a mid-term kicking. It’s doubtful however that many activists will be overly taken by the novelty of it all.
Cayla has been going to her pre kindy sessions at ‘My Time’ for a few weeks now and things are going well. It is only 7 kids in the group and 6 of them have got downs syndrome. The sessions involve activities that will prepare them for kindy (school) next year so we have mat time, fruit/lunch time, singing and lots of other fun activities. The teachers are using sign language and pictures to make it easier for the kids to understand what’s happening and what is expected of them. I think it’s a great little playgroup and hoping to pick up some sign language. The other mums are really nice and Cayla seems to enjoy herself as well which is great!
You’re my little cuthulu
And as you move on, remember me,
I want to share an effective gardening technique. Chop and drop. I am refurbishing older gardens. Today I removed the remaining plants from a few gardens that had run their course and I did NOT till, just weeded. Then I topped with IMO #4 and bio char. On top of that I took whole branches of gliricida and covered the IMO beds. Master Cho says IMO love 60% shade. He also wants us to emulate nature by providing inputs on the soil surface as nature would do rather than till in nutrients as man has done in modern times. Putting whole branches provides shade but also plenty of oxygen (because of the physical space) for the aerobic microbes to grow. In a few weeks the leaves will dry and fall off the branches providing additional organic matter. The woody branches will break down by the action of the aerobic microbes. While I wait for seedlings to be ready to transplant, this technique allows me to be patient. The microbes are at work in the garden bed. When I do transplant seedlings, they will rocket because the soil is alive.
Newt Gingrich but he will probably flip-flop
2 generating
It's finally cooled off enough to be fall-like outside and we're enjoying that, too. I'm over the heat and humidity as I know most everyone else is, too.
Perhaps the worst outtake from these statistics and facts is the way President Obama continues to hold onto the belief that government spending—the failed stimulus, “investments” in renewable energy, et cetera—is the way to turn the economy around.
his shift. A flashback to the thermal lance;
Not quite sure what the criteria were, but I feel like I ought to be giving a crocheting tutorial followed by a lecture on Guatemala’s economy now to prove I’m worthy of the title…
Much to the Creationists dismay and insistence that it doesn’t,the Earth does evolve and adapt. So we moved from mosses and ferns to pine trees and ginkgos to flowering deciduous trees. We moved from mostly reptilian forms to mammalian and avian forms.
Many of my friends create thoughts and feelings in me that challenge me to challenge myself to constantly seek to improve and grow. I’m so excited for the future, to see where my path leads, to see where it leads people I have met (and have the honor to call friends), and to see who I will meet and be inspired by next.
of coffee on, or a heavy book,
A lot of new writers are being told to start right in the action, and this tip is wrong…well, it needs to be clarified. We need some kind of conflict in the beginning to make us (the reader) choose to side with/like the protagonist. This conflict doesn’t necessarily have to do with the main story problem (directly). I know some of you are a bit confused so let me explain a little.
I love painting . . . which sometimes I don't understand. After a long day of sanding, painting, distressing, etc. my back is usually killing me (I can't seem to keep myself from hunching over), my hair is often painted red, blue or yellow, my fingernails are filled with stain and my face is dusted with saw dust. But, messy and tired though it makes me, it gives me a feeling of contentment. There is just something about taking the ugly and making it beautiful . . . Kind of what God wants to do for each of us, if we just give Him control. Put down that spackle and let God take over, girl friends!
Glory to God in the highest heaven, and peace on earth to those with whom He is pleased! Amen!
But it's all going to be awesome.In the down times I'm going to pack and declutter like a demon. I'm going to enjoy all of the holiday time we have coming up. I'm going to celebrate the birth of both my first and lastborn on their special day. I'm going to rock the conference-both the speaking and the after party.
Size: medium (18kg, 45 cm)
For as in Adam all die, *
无邪的纯真
July 20
Makes 1 Jam Jar Vegetarian
4. True Blood (Sookie Stackhouse novels) by Charlaine Harris – I loved the tv show and held off reading the books for a long time as I was afraid that the books would give something away. However, the books go on a completely different path! These are easy reads, sorta chick lit but still very good and I’m looking forward to the next one!
Well, I got off to a great start... One post and then I missed a week! It was Spring Break though and we went to the beach... But I didn't miss my journaling... What a gift it has been, I am learning SO much along the way...
*Make a notebook of favorite art pieces by printing pictures from the internet and writing about them.
I found out in December that my condo was finally allowing washers and dryers inside our units, as opposed to using the oh-so-convenient method of hauling it outside to the communal laundry room.
Thursday I went flying out of work early and over to the middle school, after receiving a call from the guidance counselor that my 14-year-old, 8th-grade son was “involved in an incident.” Translation–he and another 8th-grader got into a namecalling, shoving match and the other kid (twice Josh’s size) picked him up and tossed him down the stairs. Hard tile stairs. Took him to the walk-in clinic for bruised hip and ginormous abrasion on his R forearm. He was so stiff he slept on the couch b/c he couldn’t climb the stairs to his room.
“ It is clear that the press were systematically and deliberately targeted by the police force.
1 imagination
And why did reading it make me so happy to be unschooling, you ask? Because Jerry is already in the real world. By the time he is the age I was when I wrote that essay (or the beginning of what was meant to be an essay) he'll be so far ahead of me in life experience and self-knowledge that I don't think he'll ever experience those first few years after college (if he goes) as anything but joyful. For me they were the exact opposite. Anyway, I hope you got a good laugh out of that. Or at least a good cringe. :)
What are some other signs you all can think of? And do you disagree with any of these? If you do, it’s probably one of the ones a guy friend told me…. just sayin’ lol.
And now I'm reminding you. Wear sunscreen, avoid getting burned, learn what to watch for. They tell you the ABCs of melanoma - assymetrical, brown or black, changing. It's good to know those, because melanoma kills. But especially if you have a light complexion, blue or green eyes, and a history of sunburns, you should know that non-melanoma skin cancers may be white or pink, are often pearly but can take many forms, sometimes show up where there was an injury or an insect bite. Wikipedia and other sites have good info, sometimes with fairly grisly photos. Don't let yourself show up there.
I took that photo above to illustrate where this happened, and then I remembered that the Cake Man Raven's shop is just up the street, and during the summer the celebration held in his honor and attended by the Councilwoman Tish James and Marty (i wanna be Boro Prez for life)Markowitz took place basically a several feet away from today's shooting.
It’s true that our political system consists mostly of democrats (left) and republicans (right). The middle is usually reserved for independents (moderates). After studying the political spectrum for a time, I thought, “What if the spectrum was actually a circle? What if the ideas of the far left and the far right actually began to wrap around and start to touch?” My first thoughts are that the points of the circle would come close to touching but do not quite touch because if you are in a situation where radicals or reactionaries are ruling, the results would look amazingly similar. Once again, I look to Google to answer my most perplexing life questions.
Home Care Pulse was launched in 2008 and is a company specializing in measuring and benchmarking client and employee satisfaction for private duty home care agencies. Recently Home Care Pulse conducted the largest study ever performed on behalf of the private duty industry. Home Care Pulse helps agencies promote and drive business, improve service quality and increase employee loyalty. Visit www.homecarepulse.com for more information.
~ Each photo needs to be linked up by 11:59 pm Eastern Time on Saturday
You act from the heart, and it shows. You are refreshingly generous.
This copy is autographed.
2 consequences
Show the penny “in” a glass. When you show the penny, it only seems to be in the glass. It is really under the bottom of the glass. Then cover the glass with a cloth and give it to a friend. When your friend looks, the penny is gone!
I can get lost in that smile, I thought.
But then again, I have moral dilemmas over stupid things like frivolously buying a new package of hair elastics at $3.69, when I could probably just clean out underneath the bed and find some.
Serving.
A low rumble echoed around me, and the tall, dark trees went still. Not even a
MEDIUM TERM: DOW in confirmed downtrend, SPX likely to follow
- Financial Deals – Analysis of the companys financial deals including Mergers and Acquisitions, Equity/Debt Offerings, Private Equity, Venture Financing and Partnerships.
my second big screw up this week (who's counting?) is laverne. this poor piece suffered years of second-hand smoke and then was tossed to the curb to congregate with the three-legged tables while covered in grass clippings.
Also, my poor knowledge of music theory is showing quite clearly. I made some good progress in this respect especially over the past couple of months when I was preparing for my final assessment. I learned to play a good number of scales for my tunes and have been able to memorise them much more efficiently since.
I have the sense that to many Russians’ minds, these are the men who stepped into the power vacuum that emerged in the wake of the Soviet Union’s rather sudden collapse. Maybe not these exact thugs, but other, bigger-time thugs, opportunists with extensive criminal histories who knew how to seize the moment, or the oil industry, or whatever happened to be lying around for the taking. And now these delightful fellows are enjoying the bounties of freedom! The freedom to fly planeloads of hookers to alpine resorts! I imagine our young entrepreneurial dinner companions, now 40something, tearing the corks out of bottles of Cristal with their teeth somewhere on the French Riviera.
It's got money for drones to perform surveillance on American citizens, but no funds for sealing the border with Mexico or purchasing the fighter jets we'll most assuredly need now that Iran, China and Russia are on the rise.
It ended in a continuing impasse, with each party sketching out their own plans and showing little common ground.
I will post a picture of the completed configurations box as soon as Jamie gets a chance to send one across to me (Poor Sharon & Jamie have the long task of emptying the stash and stands out of the car and putting them all back into the shop .. & in this awful weather too :( )
All the best Julia.
John Harvey is the author of the richly praised Charlie Resnick novels, the first of which, Lonely Hearts, was named by The Times as one of the ’100 Best Crime Novels of the Century’. His first novel featuring Frank Elder, Flesh and Blood, won the CWA Silver Dagger in 2004, and a Barry Award for the Best British Crime Novel published in the US in 2004. In 2007 John Harvey was awarded the CWA Cartier Diamond Dagger and in 2009 he was awarded an honorary degree, Doctor of Letters, by the University of Nottingham. To find out more about John Harvey visit his website at: www.mellotone.co.uk
It is not just the cold weather that is getting me down. Fall is the hardest time of year for me for another reason. This is the time of year that everything started going south for me as a young teen. And while most of the things I will be sharing today happened 6 years ago, it was only recently that I have been able to really deal with the fact that they happened and that it was wrong, so many of the ‘old’ wounds, are still fresh in my heart. So I’m taking this time to remember, to look back, and to heal. So I can keep moving forward.
Okay. long post, but I missed you!! MWAH xoxo Jodi
I have been away from the computer, my computer is broken, my husbands laptop (what I am typing on) is available at night. I kept thinking the break from the Internet would be good, maybe I wouldn't dwell so much. but....when my daughter is dead...there is no control, I dwell, how do I not. She is my breath and my heart and I miss her with all I am. I came back and started reading some blogs last night and I felt immediately comforted and simultaneously sad. I cry for others because there are so few I connect with who truly understand the anguish that we feel as baby loss parents. Thank you to all of those who sent me emails and sent me love. I can't tell you how much I appreciate it.
I would bet the higher rate of autism has to do with other things that make us stay skinny: like aspartame in everything, and how about the pink slime in McDonald’s Hamburgers? Then, there’s always high fructose corn syrup.
It seems like I'm always doing a "banana" recipe--trying to come up with something different than the usual quick bread. Well, I've never made a coffeecake, so here it is.
By contrast, the country that used be in a union with Slovakia, Czechia, has however fallen into a recession and so have Britain, Hungary and Holland, and as stated above various southern European countries.
Hi peeps and hope that you are all OK and having a nice week :)
UPDATE: 12th October, 2011. Neil Callanan who used write for Ireland’s Sunday Tribune before it folded at the start of this year is now writing for Bloomberg and reports that Paddy McKillen has opened an action in London’s High Court, apparently to protect his shareholding but it is not quite clear what this entails. The case title is: “McKillen v. Barclay & Ors.” and the case number is HC11C03437 in the High Court of Justice, Chancery Division (London).
You are in the unique position of owning your own analog studio. Setting aside my envy for a moment, doesn't that particular method of recording require a degree of preparedness and/or patience beyond what's normally expected of a 21st century Rock group?
However we have started shopping for Annabelle now lol... we have a few clothes (just couldn't help myself lol) and some baby toiletries and all the stuff for a very girly bedroom lol...
15.- Utilize appropriate occasions for teaching the children about Christ, through the day, each day.
When the check I have earned arrives, I'll be pleased and will take it to the bank. That moment will provide a certain level of satisfaction, but it won't begin to compare with the longer lasting satisfaction that comes with sharing a project with someone who pays you with their costly time, their precious thoughtfulness and their treasured personal stories.
I would like to achieve a ancillary agenda about this post. My computer recognizes the spelling of Pokemon accurately ONLY if there's an emphasis on the é. I adulation my Mac.
We made sure he laid flat the next few days.
Brodsky again asked about the appropriate relationship between public and private investment.
* Allow for anyone to choose to have ½ of their social security payment placed in a savings or investment account – this can go to 100% once all previous debts for this program have been paid off – probably at least another 50 years or so.
This change in attitudes is chiefly based, in my opinion, on the false assumption that some people have and whereby they believe that they own their favourite actors, poets or musicians. And given that all they need now is a click of the mouse nowadays to express their discontent if their objects of their affection fail to produce work worth of their appreciation, the verbal abuse to which they can potentially be subjected is more immediate. This act of appropriation is intimately linked to a sense of identification with the lives of those who're found almost permanently hogging the limelight. One extreme leads to stalking, whilst the other could well plunge a normal, law-abiding citizen into an unexpected depression, should he or she find out that their "star(s)" is/are in distress. Imaginary identification, plus ownership.
Sand is actual sand paper
Only the 1st entry in mandatory to enter, you can add as many additional entries up to the 10 as you want to maximize your chances of winning! You comments do not all need to be separated for each entry as long as it’s clear how many entries you are adding. Thank you for entering and thank you Debbi for the great giveaway! You have until midnight Pacific Time on April 18th to enter. Winner will be announced on April 19th.
To: Nancy Buffone Subject: Re: Public Documents Request Business is gone (but some checks remain). You can just rip it up (save postage). Care to comment on the report? I'm going to release it in full.
1. Hangnail - Don't Forget About Tomorrow
3. What is your favorite dinner when you go out? Qdoba's Grilled Chicken Burrito!
The economic center of the civilized world--which determines the social equilibrium--has shifted westward throughout history: Babylon to Rome, Rome to Constantinople, Constantinople to Venice, Venice to Antwerp. It flourished in Holland as late as 1760, but by 1815 it was in London; the tide has been running since toward America, and that transfer of economic and political power now is nearly complete - so Brooks Adams wrote in 1900. The Spanish-American War was a token of American economic supremacy. England is faced with a long and dreadful decay, and America must take precautions to avoid participating in the ultimate collapse of Britain. A tremendous contest begins to loom between the power of Asia, possibly dominated by Russia, and the American power; the question will be decided in China and Korea, and in years to come, the mineral resources of China will produce a new economic phase. To win in this competition will require intense centralization: "If expansion and concentration are necessary, because the administration of the largest mass is the least costly, then America must expand and concentrate until the limit of the possible is attained; for Governments are simply huge corporations in competition, in which the most economical, in proportion to its energy, survives, and in which the wasteful and slow are undersold and eliminated."
Sunday...back to lecture. It was too nice outside to go home and relax after lecture so instead I went for a walk along the beach (third row, middle right) with my parents and their pups, including the little guy (third row right). With lots of energy from the sun we decided to go out on an adventure double date with my parents to dinner at one of our favorite Japanese restaurants (bottom row, middle right). We went for yakitori (skewers bottom right) and left joyfully satisfied! We made a stop at the Japanese market and drove home eating banana popsicles and cream puffs. Yummmm. You know life is good when one of your favorite double dates can be had with your parents!
Jonah then mounts the remaining live horse and Smith gets on his (safely hiding in some nearby bushes) and they ride off into the setting sun.
It’s NOT numb!
Mother Dearest, Mother Fairest
That reverently passes away.
She's still got the bass.
I thought I would give you a little peek at the new pillows I found for my family room yesterday.
So, all those little snot-nosed kiddos I saw at the pediatrician’s on Monday managed to give me their germs. I have decided that I just don’t think pediatrics can be my thing. I see all these sick, sniffly little tykes and I just have to hug them. And what do I get for my efforts? A blast of spit right in the face. I can’t help it though – they just look so sick and cute and helpless.
See the difference? The fact that people want to kill Andromeda isn't a plot. The fact that she doesn't know where she comes from isn't a plot. What's at stake if she finds out she's really from Betelgeuse not Narulon? If she learns to read his mind isn't a choice--the choice is if she learns to read his mind she'll turn into a toad, does she choose to do that? The choices she must make are the plot.
download the tickets :)
C) Is no big deal.
Having just re-read my September post I realise we all develop Survival Strategies to keep us feeling safe. Essential. But sometimes these strategies could be restricting us from living a life which is much greater, more passionate, fun and fulfilling than the one we have right now.
Two days ago (Monday April 30th, 2012) I went on a mission to the local shopping centre. It was a seemingly ordinary mission for me, I was on the hunt for Sweet Poison: Why sugar makes us fat by David Gillespie. After inner debates about the price ($29.95!!! – Book prices in Australia are a joke!) I flicked through the pages and walked up to the counter in Dymocks and purchased it. I came home and read the whole book that day and what I read shocked and surprised me. Below is the journey that led me to today.
In this historic district are ruins of slave cabins, a magass (drying) shed, a windmill tower, a horse mill, an oven, a boiling house, a curing house and overseers’ quarters, a water cistern and a dungeon, a still house, a rum still, a firing trench and an ox pound.
When I posted to Facebook about seeing the movie, I got a couple of inquiries about whether the movie was appropriate for their kids. It's rated PG-13, and the crew worked VERY hard to keep it that way.
Gram’s strength lies in research. She loses herself for hours among the tomes when a topic speaks to her. Always better at research than Imma, Gram can write about most topics after a bit of research, even if she knows nothing about it at the beginning. Her analytical brain lends itself to taking apart a topic, digesting it, and then presenting it to others in a logical, but engaging way. She can bring logic to bear on political and other topics that require this type of thinking. If she is not careful, she will put too much into an article, and often must use her information for several smaller articles or posts, or create a serial article. How to articles are also her forte, although she may tend to write on certain types of how to articles more than others. She can usually find a way to write about any of them, however, even though her interest may wane.
She is accomplished in the art of Japanese embroidery, as well as the traditional types of cross-stitch and crewel that many of us do. Who wouldn't feel creative in a cozy sitting area like this? Like us, Peri has used pre-made kits that have all the instructions and yarns included, but sometimes before she snuggles in to start making art from fiber, she actually designs her own work, meaning she starts from scratch.
And what will next week bring? As we start to move deeper into the season and more hawkwatches open, you can certainly bet on more hawks!
Oatmeal Cookie Chunk
I want to paint the women and men of the Bible, but in a fresh way. I'm not sure how to describe it, so you will need to bare with me and I will show as much as I can through sketches. The pieces "Midnight Warrior" and "Sienna" (yes, her name had to be changed) are great examples of the direction I want to go. Mix those with "Translucence" and you may get the vision.
In fact, this past Tuesday, the decibel level became so unbearable that the Red Cross professionals were forced to close the blood drive and turn away donors. They resorted to rescheduling for Thursday, June 2nd. It is a travesty to think that selfless individuals, willing to donate their own blood to help another in need, would even be put in that predicament. The issue I raise is not, of course, the ability of the Protest group to express its displeasure. There is no question that they certainly are within their constitutional right to do so. I fully support free speech and citizen engagement in the political process. However, I have an enormous problem when the rights of one group infringe on the rights of all others, or completely deprive the opportunity to utilize our State Capitol.
Necklace: House of Harlow
Lauren DeStefano did an incredible job with her first novel. The beautiful writing and disturbing descriptions really made Wither into a book that many who read will fall in love with. The characters were all driven by something and the story shows the meaning of life hidden behind a horrible world full of some truly horrible people. I just had to pick up the sequel, Fever, after finishing this one, just to see what disturbing twists and turns the author would add this time.
One of my very favorite things about Christmas is crying Santa pictures.
no points for seeing where i had to start walking.
*When I used this in my coffee, I needed a bit more sugar than normal. When you sift the sugar, it must lose a bit of its strength as it becomes finer. If you are using this as a substitute in baking, just be aware that you may need to adjust the amount.*
Prevention of falls is a huge nursing responsibility. And just as falls have many factors that increase risk, there are many preventative measures to consider. Considering just the patient's immediate environment in a hospital room requires thinking about condition of the bathroom and shower, their hospital gown, lighting, floor condition, footwear, suitability of chairs, bed height, bed wheels, and side rail position.
If you plan to use cages, select a sturdy one, and place it in the ground when you transplant the seedlings. If you wait until the seedling grows into a large plant first, you risk seriously damaging the plant when you try to squeeze it into the cage.
I took 13" wide strips of fabric, 32" long (for the living room windows...longer and wider in the bedroom). I chose one of the fabrics that I used in the quilts I made last year that you can read about here). I folded it lengthwise with right sides together (so that the fabric was double thickness) and stitched across the top and down the open side. Then I clipped the corners, turned it right-side-out and pressed the fabric. I created four pleats across the top and stitched them in place.
Shigeta S, Aikawa H, Misawa T, Yoshida T, Momotani H, Suzuki K. Learning impairment in rats following low-level toluene exposure during brain development - a comparative study of high avoidance rats and Wistar rats. Industrial Health 1986; 24: 203-211.
We saw a total of nine roe deer and a fox that we probably wouldn't have seen if we'd come earlier in the day as planned. Ian also saw a little mammal scurry and jump into a wood pile. We suspect that it was a weasel, but will never know.
Yes, they are still a band. All 4 guys who make up the band are original members. And we were thrilled when our radio station announced that they were bringing their tour here(who knew!). They are coming to the brand new Raleigh amphitheater tonight at 7pm, and we are so psyched! Don't worry, we got permission from our sweet husbands who I think are just thankful that we didn't ask them to come with us :)
Suspiria (1977)
Some chap from Dubai took time out from driving his Mercedes round and round to pen a few hundred cheerily uninformative words for The Guardian's web-based Comment is Free rubric on why the bold ouster of Kyrgyzstan's tawdry Mr Bakiyev was not likely to be repeated with the Arab world's sullen satraps.
What did you do in the war, Daddee?
Man’s Search for Happiness: A film masterpiece originally produced for the 1964 World’s Fair that, as the Encyclopedia of Mormonism notes, “is less than fifteen minutes long, yet explores every man’s search for meaning in life: the whence, the why, and the whither.” Not to be confused with Viktor Frankl’s “Man’s Search for Meaning,” which is kind of a downer.
It seems like it was only recently that fashion photography was acknowledged as an art form. But even so, it is not often featured in gallery shows and it was by chance that I stumbled across a show called Threads: Six Masters of Fashion Photography at the Diemar/Noble Photography Gallery in London. On display and for sale was the work of six fashion photographers including:
2. It was Blyleven, not Morris, who won more 1-0 games over the last 50 years than any other pitcher.
Because we’ve always known that Sookie loves Sam. He’s her best friend. And some people have a hard time dealing with that type of platonic love. I know some people probably think it’s weird that my husband and I essentially share the same best friend, that we all have this bond together, but separately, too. But there are so many different kinds of love, and I think a lot of problems can arise when you try to fit it into a certain category, only allow for affection and love to be romantic or sexual.
So if you are already a member of the group, that is great. If you are not then head on over and check it out. Bring a friend or two and have them join in the fun as well.
I am not what I am
At this point, you may be asking a few questions, such as – Why is the tree in focus, and not the people? Why does she have her sunglasses in her teeth? Why does she keep shooting these self portraits, again and again and again? And perhaps most importantly, why does she keep posting them?!?!
Today we made crackers for our festive table. I have no photos to share as I can't remember where I put the camera! But I didn't want to miss a day at this point :) Our crackers contain a hat, a joke, a Ferrero Rocher (the grown ones love these but we only get one 16 pack a year!), a party blower (because the boys love them) and a party popper. Not at all green or sustainable but we do them this way every year and so we might always do so. And besides, we try so hard all year round, surely we can indulge in a little consumerism and not remotely green behaviour in a tiny amount?
Walking through our local weekly market I spy something you don’t see in Malaysia, Brownies! Adrian and Erika run their own cookie farm, growing and raising brownies, cookies and cakes like my mother use to make. The “California Cookie Company” is the real deal and I stop by their table every week.
Welcome to the British Freedom Party Cllr. Simpkins.
So there's a little peek into what's getting us into the Spring Spirit! Hope y'all are having a Hippity Hoppity Friday! Peyton's not feeling all that well today so we're having a pajama and movie day...currently we're watching Toy Story 2, its sure to be a great day with this combo!
Abdoulaye Faye bagged a late equaliser against one of his former clubs to give us a very valuable away point. Stoke did well to come back from 2-0 down after the first half with Big Mama getting Stoke’s first goal following a Fuller pass. Why we started with Cresswell and Danny Pugh who knows and once Ricardo Fuller & Glen Whelan (his free kick provided the Faye goal) came on we were all over Newcastle. The Delap throw in seems to losing its effect as well as the season progresses and Sonko seems to have a big throw on him, although his come in high and are easier to defend than Rory Delap’s powerful, low angled throws.
In the Old Testament, we see God hears the cries of His people and comes and rescues them.
Things are in the saddle and ride mankind, Emerson said. He would have understood planned technological obsolescence perfectly. The nerdy techno-freaks who keep re-programming stuff get their kicks from the technology as an end in itself. They can't imagine that 95 percent of their customers simply care about the technology as a tool, don't want pointless new features, and particularly resent software revisions that offer no real-world benefit.
Katie
I already buy pastured, locally raised meat at the Food Co-Op. What do I need a butcher shop for?
Its story is as follows, the place where this tree grows is a beautiful (and at that time residential) spiritual centre, a Yoga Ashram-(place of hard work). It was founded by a very wonderful, very awakened Hindu, a Yogi, a man who lived a wonderful inspiring and very spiritualised life and who in that time was a recognised spiritual leader within the Vedanta tradition of India. When he came to Australia, many years ago, he planted this tree and another at the Ashram, one died, the other, the one I was sitting under that evening is still alive.
First, make the salad dressing: combine the shallot, vinegar, 1 tablespoon lemon juice, a few grinds of pepper and a hearty pinch of salt in a bowl, let stand while you cut the grapefruits.
My mom used to say that my hair looked like a bird’s nest, but I disagree. I think it’s more like Medusa’s snaky hairdo.
No one is certain of the exact timing, though, and the “windows” are always changing based on unpredictable events.
20. Tennessee Titans WR Kendall Wright (Bay) The Titans are another team desperately needing a 1 WR, Kendall Wright RG3 favorite target gets the opportunity to start a 1-2 connection with Jake Locker provided Hasselbeck is gone.
I don’t think they will, although Alex Salmond is a big fish in ‘Skintland’, he is nothing in the London melting pot without his First Minster title.
The perforated canvasses marked the starting of a new “Concetto Spaziale” Spatial Concept and did not come until the beginning of 1950. It was this idea that really left a mark in the art world.
Planning a birthday party for your child can be a daunting task. Combined with today's economy and it can be downright stressful! With a little planning and ingenuity, you will find you can throw a fabulous & memorable party on a tight budget.
(The irony was that the 'Moonshine' I'd consumed was in fact a brand of multi-purpose surface cleaner, and Aunt Sally had nothing with which to clean up my little mess! Life, eh?!)
scanned past the labels,
01. Polly
My first traditionally published picture book A Book For Bramble was inspired by the work I do with a hedgehog rescue centre, Herts Hogline. One winter whilst checking on a hedgehog that was hibernating I began to wonder what they dream about. I jotted down a story about the dreams Bramble might have. Six re-drafts later my story became a small mouse missing his hibernating hedgehog friend.
#31 According to the U.S. Census Bureau, 6.7% of all Americans are living in "extreme poverty", and that is the highest level that has ever been recorded before.
I got talking chatting with Nik, who told me the four of them had previously decided that they were going to rent a car and drive to Key West on Friday and that they needed another person to fill the car. There was only one thing I could do; agree immediately. NIk told me the plan was to pick the car up at 07:30am, at which point I encountered a few doubts about partying with Sergio. At the time, Nik convinced me he would be out tonight as well and that we could sleep off the hangover on the way.
That is precisely what I did. And then I almost tossed my cookies from exhaustion.
1--A lovely day with rainy smile.
All of this building tension - a tension that goes from being pleasantly coiled to excruciatingly awful to watch - is punctuated by rare moments of sweet, almost needy, affection: when they're not screaming at each other, Jimmy and Alison cuddle and coo about being a "bear and a squirrel", Alison and Cliff cuddle and coo ("My lovely!" Cliff always exclaims), and Jimmy and Cliff wrestle and rough-house like schoolboys. It's a strange, compelling roller coaster of ups and… well, not so much downs, as when the roller coaster breaks off the tracks and goes flying away.
Сирия: вице-президент заменит Асада и совершит самоубийство 16,216 tons of goods entered Gaza last week Joke of The Day Brig. Gen. Nimrod Shefer appointed Chief of the Planning Directorate Harvard students turned back after entering closed military zone Iran’s last chance? Report: War to occur before year’s end if P-5+1 talks fail Delhi police confirm Iran behind embassy attack Записки нового репатрианта Hamas and Hezbullah to act in their own interests and not Iran’s Сирены и дети: израильские реалии Gaza teen transported to Israel for medical care
Seriously interesting. At first, I was stunned by Sang Woo’s retarded acting in which I quickly understand that its due to his old past and disease. Jung Ryeo Won was really a perfect actress for the movie, with having a skinny physique, appearance which resembles a sick patient. Both acted well, storyline was good until the bad ending came. Ending sucks.
Question Spotlight: Should I Grease My SIlicone Cookware Before Use?
Fans of the University of Arkansas are still upset about the Bobby Petrino scandal. What was their coach doing in a car kissing someone who wasn’t a relative?
I’d love to say that Annie exiting this show was actually a massive shock but seeing as it’s been telegraphed all season long, it’s more inevitable that her journey would come to an end in this episode. However, even I didn’t actually expect her to blow up the Old Ones and baby Eve in order to prevent the former from taking over the world.
If you had to go back and do it all over, is there any aspect of Dawn of Angels or getting it published that you would change?
See, I'm finding homes for my tomatoes (and those other plants) by either exchanging them for AIDS LifeCycle donations, selling them at our neighborhood garage sale or trading them for goods at our neighborhood produce swap.
The purpose of the flotilla was to deliver humanitarian aid like water purification systems, and reconstruction supplies like cement.
Step 5Tumble the ring to harden and burnish the sterling silver ring and silver mercury dime.
Thank you to Jen for sharing these insights into her family's experiences, and for encouraging us all to take a more biblical and spiritual approach to our marriages. WB
I think tomorrow night I am going to try stuffed peppers using tofu and brown rice.
He LOVES Wasbi Peas and is therefore more hardcore than his Mum.
That's the sound of my life blowing by.
Mind, thats not as dramatic as it sounds, all things permitting, that next time will be in September, though a long way east from here! Tomorrow morning is a fine example of why I hate travelling home from the West Coast, the flight leaves Seattle at 8.35 am, so you can imagine the time I have to be up, etc… Mind, apart from packing, and a quick round up, I’m ready to go now.
But how had that happened? Well, it was a VERY windy day and the door will blow open if it is left unlocked. I called my husband at work, and after a very brief interrogation period, he admitted to having been outside before he left for work and must have forgotten to lock the door. Obviously my husband learned nothing from watching all six seasons of The Sopranos. He would be sleeping with the fishes right now if he weren’t so darn cute.
Go to the movies or catch it on DVD?
And then I planted oregano. At least I believe it was oregano. Whatever it was, I call it Hitler. The big bully marched right over everything as if it was his right. He trampled the sage, which had a branch about an inch in diameter, and got my lemon verbena without blinking an eye. Swallowed the chives whole!
promised I'd take good care of her
Yeah, the High School of Art and Design. I never knew
Their new and innovative TV special is named Eat This, Drink That. The first of what I’m sure will be countless episodes (and no doubt an Emmy award or two) premiers on the Cooking Channel – March 4th, at 8 pm. The Cooking channel website says a lot of well-deserved nice things about our good friends and their show. The one hour special takes the Beer Chicks on the road where they meet individuals creating new rules for pairing food with drink. One of the Chicks’ stop is at my favorite South Louisiana brewery where they “explore unexpected concoctions with passion fruit and coffee.”
I mentioned this to our mayor, Dan Sullivan, who said he was aware of the issue. Previously, Mark Begich was mayor, and his brother Nick Begich is an expert on fluoride’s mind effects. Nick, we need you on local, Anchorage radio!
I'm a train wreck in the morning
26th April Social Welfare and Pensions Bill 2012: Committee Stage (Resumed)
Each of the unlockable cups are abandoned afar in one engine chic at a time. For example, if you alleviate Brilliant Cup in 50cc you will still accept to alleviate it in 150cc.
PTSD is an interesting thing. Emotions and memories come flooding back when something is similar to a traumatic event from the past. It's especially difficult if during the initial trauma you attempted to suppress or ignore those feelings. If you don't feel them during the event, you will eventually feel them -- when it's safe. So that's the point. The fact that I felt the fear intensely is important. It means that in the here and now I felt safer than I did in the past. Safe enough to acknowledge that I was so afraid. Safe enough to keep my distance and tell him I felt threatened by him. Safe enough to protect myself and draw my own boundaries. Safe enough to begin to process the events from the past and start to heal from them.
As the whales escaped from sight, Kath turned to me and demanded to know what kind of magic I was working. I wanted to know the same thing of her – she called the mantas, now the whales? I was excited for the inevitable manatee sighting. Of course, that sighting never came. In 9 years as a dive master at Komodo, Kath and Ernest have seen a dugong a total of twice. But it didn’t matter – I’ll never forget the humpback whale jumping less than a hundred feet from me.
"Gah! You brat, get off," he said, when she flumped down next to him and laid her head on his shoulder. He shrugged to dislodge her, but she just moved with him and gave him a grin. "Can't you see I'm working here? Some of us have to study."
“We ran out of mana repeatedly. The Institute has decided that the Ancient Golem’s Blessing was too powerful, and have lowered its mana return…” said Jagred, meekly.
Finding out what type of buying style someone has is not as difficult as it seems. With a little practice you will learn to pick up on subtle clues that they give you while talking that should allow you to adapt your approach on the fly. By mirroring the buyer you can be confident that you are at least close to their same level of interest in your product or idea. By mirroring the buyer I mean their intensity, demeanor, body positioning etc. Pay attention to how they sit down. Are they moving their hands when they talk? Do they speak loudly or softly? These are all things to be observing in every situation.
Gourmet magazine’s October 2007 issue features a guide to “America’s Best Farm-to-Table Restaurants.” gourmet.com:
I’ve mentored spiritual seekers for two (2) decades now. Many of them I met in the astral and etheric planes, while some others I did handle right here on the ground. From out of their narratives did I conclude that evil masters are very busy disguising as Light Beings whose messages request to be channeled and disseminated.
After the spectators are impressed you can speak to Milo to claim your reward. There is a 3 minute timer for the quest and if not enough fireworks are not fired during time, you will fail the quest.
I can only imagine the moments like this both mom and dad will have when Baby Dazz is here. Learning to parent, learning to let go, learning that worry and fear will follow them for years, learning that your baby will always be your baby even when they are adults and in the midst of becoming parents themselves.
Pirouettes begin with stillness,
BH and I are talking about re-doing our bathroom. Nothing huge--some new mirrors, new paint, new drawers. But I'm excited!! I'm sure we won't do anything until after we get the wedding behind us, but I'll be ready to rock when we finally get going.
One of my favorite things about the desert is that you can see the Sun rise and set. If you get up on a hill, you can get an amazing view.
......When Father Jessie tries to calm the boys down, Dan calls him a nigger! Father Jessie was played by Chuck Patterson, and I'm pretty sure IMDB is totally screwed up on this one, as they show him to be in a surfing movie coming out this year! I'm not seeing him as one of the world's best surfers when he would be in his 60's! This is not the first time I've noticed you can't believe everything you read on the internet, even on reputable sites like IMDB, I found out the same thing about my pal Whitey Thomas!
I like the overall esthetics. While the colors are muted, this cake is for a small boy who is too young to know esthetics of bold colors. So I'm happy I was able to throw this all together. I especially like the fact that I used the round to create a background as well as a platform from the cake! I cut two cakes in half and stacked them, like a diorama!
Anyway, to hell with the branding - the most important thing is that this is a properly first class English beer, with a sense of superiority that punches far above it's micro-brewery weight.
Limes
7. GHARBZADEGI (9:41)
A woman and her cute kids in their humble abode. I felt honored to be let into the house. Sometimes, taking pictures of people actually lets me establish a pretty good connection with them rather than just using them to make a sweet image. I always try to talk to them. And by talking, I mean smiling, because I do NOT speak enough Kannada.
But hey, there are 96 cans at the warehouse, right?
I cannot begin to imagine the immigrant experience when coupled with the displacement of a war.
“That damn book was fifty bucks!” he exclaimed.
As you are probably pretty well aware if you have been a regular reader of my blog (and if you are, I would totally brush your hair and take you shopping and tell you that you're pretty if you were here) you will know that we are no where near done yet on our kitchen remodel.
As you exhale envision directing that energy to Jacqueline
This card "accidentally" fell together. I had some scraps on my desk and they were laying on top of each other when my eye caught the arrangement and I thought "hmmm...that could make a nice card".
2. Internet porn. Seriously, there is nothing here to love. It’s annoying when you’re trying to find something else, click on a seemingly innocent link, and then there’s penis in your face. My first exposure to porn was when I was ten. Looking for Pokemon. And instead I got naked old men all over my screen. Then there’s the fact that you cannot guarantee that amateur porn on the internet does not have someone you know in it. Could you imagine seeing your boss in a porno, then going to work the next day and pretending that you don’t know what his penis looks like? If that ever happened to me, I’d have to quit my job. And then there’s the viruses that come along with it, that sometimes mean you have to wipe your entire harddrive, thank you very much to someone who used my computer for such nefarious purposes the day after I bought it.
~Circo dress up shoes
There, I said it. Too many people simply do not want to admit that God’s plan also includes a day of judgment. They don’t want to admit that there will be consequences for their actions.
“CHOOOOOOTTT HEEE-IIIMM, CHOOOOT ELIZABETH” echoes in the swamp from day one of Troy’s run with fellow female swamper, Liz. Known for being one of very few female hunters in the entire Louisiana area (and there are only two women hunters on the show), Liz has been known to tag out before the hunting season can reach its third week. Clearly, she has no problem holding her own with the boys.
Chiefly, it is a question of non-compliance.
Lane Greene at Johnson has taken up the theme, noting that many writers have earned the “Curmudgeon Medal . . . by penning a list of detested clichés or fashionable words that are henceforth (somehow) ‘banned’.” But banning words won’t automatically improve one’s writing, and he recommends that we “can the ‘bans’”.
Scot Meacham Wood - Obviously, I would want my work to be an important part of my legacy. But, I also hope that my clients truly enjoyed the process of transforming their home. That they felt heard. That they felt understood. And when they walk through their house, that they look around and smile.
Zero sum, the two of us
chandeliers
2011 Gift and Christmas Budget Plan
He tried to focus on that, wondering how her formidability played out with steel in her hand. A part of him wanted to see her use it, another part decidedly did not. The glimpse he saw of the naked blade was enough to see it was deadly sharp.
Have yourself a whopper of a tax break
I also got a huge package of ARCs from Random House Canada YA division, some of which have already been released. They asked if I was interested in a surprise parcel and I said, of course. However there are a few of these I probably won't read so they may end up as a giveaway or for people willing to pay shipping. I have to sort that whole thing out in the upcoming weeks.
I can hurl tennis rackets at small moving objects with deadly accuracy. I once read Paradise Lost, Moby Dick, and David Copperfield in one day and still had time to refurbish an entire dining room that evening. I know the exact location of every food item in the supermarket. I have performed several covert operations for the CIA. I sleep once a week; when I do sleep, I sleep in a chair. While on vacation in Canada, I successfully negotiated with a group of terrorists who had seized a small bakery. The laws of physics do not apply to me.
Olga -- A Daughter's Tale is a story rich with historical and cultural detail, intrigue, and family. It takes place during a very interesting time period in both Jamaica's and England's history. Besides being about family, love, and doing what it takes to get through tough circumstances, this is also a study on the character of people. There are all sorts of people represented in this novel, and it's interesting to see how their actions affect other people, whether it's a good thing or a bad thing.
Even though I’ve only experienced Spain, cultures all over have their own thoughts about life; what’s rude, what’s acceptable and what certain gestures mean. If we choose to ignore them, people will get offended. I would have looked like a fool in Spain if I extended my hand to a person whose lips were already heading for my cheeks. If me stumbling over a few (and by that I mean a lot of) Spanish words didn’t created enough communication problems, me completely disregarding their culture would have taken it over the edge.
I've cut out the article to remind myself that
The Back Room - Acting Stupid
But with all due respect to Mr. Van Halen’s musical abilities (easily the MVP on their debut album), it was ultimately David Lee Roth who truly propelled the band to superstardom. No, the man couldn’t really sing very well, his so-called ability to scream paling in comparison to Roger Daltrey, Robert Plant or Ian Gillan (all of whom could sing). But what Roth had that the aforementioned didn’t was a sense of uninhibited, cocky showmanship, as well as enough self-depreciating humor to understand that rock wasn’t supposed to be art…it was supposed to be fun. How the lyrics sounded was a lot more important than the words themselves. He was the member of the band with all the good looks, the one who acted like a rock star, the one invited on all the talk shows, the one who hammed it up in VH's music videos, the one supplying an infinite number of quotable sound-bites for the press. By the time the band released their sixth album, the uberselling 1984, chutzpah and arrogance went a lot further than true talent and, for better or worse, Roth had both. If Eddie was the cake for success, but Roth was the frosting, most people’s favorite part.
Wandering the increasingly cold, bleak landscape, wind can begin to chill the bones. Turning to look for help, it is possible that darkness can fall unawares and there is only the sound of breaking twigs beneath your feet as you tread and retread familiar yet uncharted territory.
Thanks for reading everyone and thanks for inviting me over, Stephanie. :)
Thankful for the laughs and smiles you bring to my day
Ready? For a face plant into a tree, maybe reconstructive surgery? To feel my stomach ripped from my body as we plummet down the mountain? Let’s do it!
Jackie: I envision it being a spacious, surrealist Western. Very lonesome, very bleak.
I had no expectations going in, and I wasn't disappointed. I thought maybe because it starred Anthony Hopkins and that it was directed by Michael Cimino that it might at least be entertaining, but one character and a few scenes were so bad, they were laughable.
Understanding, from time to time.
After serving out a year of hard labor in the salt mines of Endovier for her crimes, 18-year-old assassin Celaena Sardothien is dragged before the Crown Prince. Prince Dorian offers her her freedom on one condition: she must act as his champion in a competition to find a new royal assassin.
Baby showers are a great time for a family get-together or family reunion. The thought of a new child in a family provides a huge relief for many. Organizing a baby shower is very important and choosing the right custom beverage napkins should reflect the theme of the party. These custom napkins will surely make your baby shower party a keepsake. There are a wide selection of styles that can be chosen for custom beverage napkins for baby shower. It can be simple, classy, formal or anything you can think of as long as it reflects the quality of the expectant mother. You can choose Sesame Street, Loney Tones, or any Disney characters; this will bring you sufficient stuff for the baby. The design of your custom napkins can be generic shapes like baby bottles, bassinets, ABC blocks or baby carriages. More creative ideas can enhance your design for your napkins and you can also add the name for your baby. The baby shower centers on gift-giving, showers typically include food but not full meal. The custom beverage napkins will be a keepsake on the day of your shower party.
I’m also so, so thankful for moment like these. Grab them while you can, my friends. They are SO precious.
And I did mention a giveaway??
But daaaamn, Spence – only a fool runs ads about how voters need to choose the person who can deal with unemployment in the midst of a news shower about how the current Governor presides over a 3 year-low for that shit.
Of course, the City Councilman mentioned in this story doesn’t seem to grasp that the whole point of this effort was to generate resources for the city corporation, not to waste them. At least, not publicly.
I believe that in life we are given more than we can handle. As we are pushed beyond our individual capacities for surviving life's trials, we lean on others when we wouldn't otherwise. As a result both parties are blessed, both the giver and the receiver. Acts of kindness are born out of love. I believe that God exists is in that love.
Some things we believe to be scriptural truths aren’t even in the scriptures.
3) Black funges. shitake mushrooms, glass noodles, bean curds,chillies and tomato. Stir well and add the water. Cover and simmer for 10 minutes.
the nastiest feuds, the silliest spokespersons,
Poverty in education can mean many things. It can mean a system in which getting into a certain school is more important than what one learns there. It can entail distraction from genuine learning, such as when someone in an elite school is too focused on networking to actually study. It can mean being taught by a well-known expert who is too self-absorbed to care whether his/her students understand him/her. It can mean being aligned with prevailing biases, so that one rarely encounters worthy opposing views, and learns to discount them unthinkingly. It can mean an assumption that one must be valuable merely because one knows how to sound good and look good. In short, poverty in education probably tends to mean being adapted to a culture, rich or poor, that very frequently values other things over actual learning.
Not so fast, gang. Even assuming you somehow re-elect barry with Dem majorities in both houses while, barry’s simply not interested in single-payer. In his impromptu teach-in he insisted that “in the absence of an individual mandate, you cannot have a mechanism to ensure that people with preexisting conditions can actually get health care.” Yet, as Single Payer Action – you, know, barry, those liberals who filed that amicus curiae brief arguing against your mandate — stated in said brief:
I just wanted to take a moment to wish each of you a Merry Christmas and also for everyone who celebrates during this season in a different way - Happy Holidays!
I'm not familiar enough with Aissawa music to know if these tunes are from the trance repertoire or from the street/processional repertoire. Whichever it is, these are some serious long jams - the group riffs it non-stop for 3+ sides of these 2 volumes:
Maybe tomorrow I will finally change my ways
And, because the White Horse is always all about demonstrating the diversity of British beers as well, they will have beer on handpull from a whole host of English beers that boast an American influence in hop form from breweries like Crouch Vale, Thornbridge and Dark Star.”
Jackie: We try to mix up our sets with short and long songs, usually playing the newest songs we wrote so we stay fresh and feel challenged. We rarely play the 20 minute songs and the older ones don’t get rotated in very much. The audience is typically pretty attentive. I see some jaw dropping, some head banging, and a lot of smiles. There has been only one air cellist thus far, but I hope to see more of them in the future! As for the type of people that attend our shows I would have to say it’s a very mixed crowd. Short-hairs and long-hairs, rockers unite!
When I was a kid reading a comic book in the 1970’s, I loved the ads for Sea Monkeys. It looked so quick and easy to brew up my own batch of the cute little critters in the comfort of my own room. Of course, I first had to cut out the order form, then (convince my mom to) write a check, mail it in, and wait 6-8 weeks for delivery. Today, if I don’t want to buy them at a local novelty store, I can place an order in mere mouse clicks and have those babies brewing tomorrow.
The stress has hit my nails too and twice now I had to cut them completely off, right to the meat. It hurts like hell for three days, even doing just simple work with your hands. You understand what I'm talking about. But most importantly, with all the work and other stuff in my life, I'm neglecting my nails. Not proud of it, but hey, it happens. That's why I'll do what I planned (and kinda succeeded) to do last year during this time of year. I'm taking a short break from blogging. A couple of weeks, I dare say, with dropping in every once in a while. Somewhat like my blogging is now, but now i'm making it 'official', if you will. If I'll have a spare moment to edit the billion photos I have and write about it, I'll definitively do that - like today, as I'm resting from the exam I had in the morning. I'm also hoping to post a couple of guest posts, if all will go as planned.
(kitchen before)
How does it happen that a child becomes older than we think we are? Today is my first-born's birthday. Although he was due on March 17th, he made me wait another entire month and a day to make his appearance. If one more person had asked if I was "still pregnant," I think I would have killed someone.
I raised much the same point last summer when Halprin was appointed asking “why, exactly, does Google want a senior client-facing executive with the word ‘Enterprise’ in his job title?” on the eDiscovery side.
Generally, vehicles improve with each successive generation. This is especially true when standing still. On the acura mdx 2006 redesign, the acura mdx 2006 redesign a 70% proportion. The Tech version which includes exclusive alloy wheels, auto-levelling headlights, an active suspension, the aforementioned DVD entertainment system, a ten-speaker DVD-Audio system, Bluetooth connectivity and additional display and control features.
Whew, ok, I think that wraps it up for this week. We're both excited to start this new sunroom project, and there's a ton of work to be done... so stay tuned!
Sunnydale's NCCU is in the grip of Big Drama these days. A particularly difficult doctor and a couple of grouchy colleagues of mine have made it their mission in life to submit incident reports for everything, and I mean *everything.* Unfortunately, the doctor writes up nurses for things that she, the doc, should've done (like writing orders) rather than get in trouble with *her* boss, and the grouchy colleagues are sending off irate and insulted emails about things like the lack of housekeeping standards 'round those parts.
PS: Yes, you have a real, proper name, but the internet is at its best when we keep a little mystery, don't you think?
Form is a big part in all this. If you’re not moving properly you’re asking for injury; especially if you’re also adding a ton of load to the mess. Your gym probably offers you a complementary training session or fitness consultation…USE IT. And tell the trainer you’d like to fix your: squat/ deadlift/ power clean/ split squat/ curl to press/ whatever! Check ‘em all! Can’t hurt; might make you better.
The defendant appealed to the US Supreme Court with Justice Byron White writing for the majority. In a 6 to 3 decision, the Court held that for the plea agreement to be accepted, the defendant must have been advised by a competent lawyer who was able to inform the individual that his best decision in the case would be to enter a guilty plea. The Court ruled that the defendant can enter such a plea “when he concludes that his interests require a guilty plea and the record strongly indicates guilt.” The Court only allowed the guilty plea with a simultaneous protestation of innocence as there was enough evidence to show that the prosecution had a strong case for a conviction, and the defendant was entering such a plea to avoid this possible sentencing. The Court went on to note that even if the defendant could have shown that he would not have entered a guilty plea “but for” the rationale of receiving a lesser sentence, the plea itself would not have been ruled invalid. As a factual basis existed that could have supported Alford’s conviction, the Supreme Court held that his guilty plea was sustainable while the defendant himself still maintained that he was not guilty.
When you land at St. George board the train to Tottenville but get off at a couple of the leafy small towns. After an hour or two of a ramble you’ll understand why so many people from Aaron Burr to Keith Richard made their home in this least lauded of boroughs.
MS: Actually there were some letters left on our whiteboard after everything had been erased and we looked at them for months and they spelled “sogg”.
“Fine,” we grumbled. “Delicious dinner another night. Tonight, we shall stand outside in freezing temperatures for several hours and futilely gaze at nothing.” So we emptied our wallets yet again, paying for a tour we had already taken, in the hopes that magic might strike.
"Nope, Mitchell. Can't be mine. I don't have a cellphone case."
If no negative testimony or comment is heard, the plan becomes effective, so no additional approval is needed.
The first big change I made was returning to 100% gluten-free eating. After much experimentation over the past 16 months I am certain that gluten causes issues for me....but I still go through phases of denial. Even just a little bit here and there causes me issues. The first issue is that I get a bit achy...my knees, shoulders, ankles (because gluten causes inflammation for me). The biggest side effect of the achiness is that I am not as eager to exercise when I feel that way...it makes me cranky and lethargic. I also start to crave stuff that I should not be eating..in quanties that are not acceptable. Oh..and...I retain water when I eat gluten. Within three days of going off gluten....all three of these issues resolve. Then, if I eat it again....they instantly return. I KNOW this..because it has happened again and again. I really MUST just never eat it..instead of stumbling around in denial like a crack-addict or something. LOL
Potato Biscuits
Skin - E000, E01, E11, R20 (for lips)
All will be fine. My post was perhaps more, um, dramatic than intended and caused several dear friends to worry. Thank you to everyone who commented and emailed and called. Let me give you a clearer picture of all that transpired:
I've been sick lately. How sick? Just your common head cold, with all the banal misery that entails. But throw in the stickiness of summer, and it feels, well, a good bit sickier.
Apparently this video went viral and helped Danny become famous for his skills on two wheels. Danny is what’s known as a ‘trials cyclist’, essentially he scouts out places that are ideal for performing elaborate stunts on his bike, usually in an urban setting. This guy has such control over his bicycle, it really seems like it’s an extension of himself; it’s really a beautiful thing to watch him do his thing.
And was ripped away
Water, 7 bowls
Me: Does it involve you getting your asshole eaten out?
With one set of PLR articles and some creativity on your part, you can extend the life of the articles to the point where the content has more than paid for itself. So when sourcing out a supplier for PLR articles, ask for sample works to demonstrate the quality of articles you would be purchasing.
Even more unfortunate, I didn’t get to use them at all. I think it was because:
Dress: D&G by Dolce & Gabbana
From the moment you enter, Skinsations’ well-designed spa ignites all your senses…and from complimentary beverages served on a silver platter, to a nap/reading room where clients can unwind post-services, to top-of-the-line products from LeAine’s own skincare line recently featured in the exclusive Oscars gift bag (LeAine Dehmer Clinical Skincare)
It would seem from this that the insurance world is starting to heat up to patents (welcome!). I've noticed the same thing, where institutional insurance companies have been asking lots of questions and are starting to stockpile patents in their portfolios. However, I have noticed that there is still a lot of confusion regarding the patent system, especially in terms of "OK, I have a patent - now what?" Well good people, get out there enforce it!
That's why many students choose to attend a vocational or technical school to obtain career education instead of a traditional four-year university.
The sound of frogs calling down rain
Many people seem to look at me now as a Voice Of Unschooling, and I find myself thinking, did I do that? I guess I did, though I didn't really realize what I was doing. I like sharing my unschooling experiences, so that's what I've been doing for the last three years, but I guess I just never knew it would get so big.
2010.09.01 Iraq Mosul 3 6 A woman is among three Iraqis taken down by a Jihadi bombing and shooting attack.
The creators of Rastamouse had them a-rockin' and a-rhymin', grown men and women squealing with delight. "Follow that," said my publisher. I tried. It seemed to go down well.
Large: 25 pounds and up
My chocolate polenta cake went down well too, especially with my niece Ella. We all agreed it was rather rich. Many preferred it with cream. I think I got it right this time. However, I still am not so keen on the texture. The grainy texture reminds of what I don't like about lots of gluten free flours. I'd much prefer to stick to flourless cakes with just ground almonds such as Jill Dupleix's recipe. Now what do I do with the rest of the maize flour?
So lately, my roommate and I have been on this ‘get our butts back into shape’ kick (which followed our more popular ‘peanut butter m&m’s and Diet Coke’ kick) and for someone who has relied on running for exercise the last 9 years, it has been quite the experience. Between the gym, hot yoga, running and boot camp, I have indeed been having my ass handed to me and it feels great.. While I long ago accepted that my aerobic coordination and balance would always be slim to non-existent, I had no idea how clumsy, awkward and downright bad I could be at a sport I used to brag about until I started club softball with my co-workers.
14 working
Carre Otis (Wild Orchid)
Scrambls allows users to encrypt posts to Facebook, Twitter and any other websites essentially creating secure personal sharing across social networks. Messages are scrambled and need to be unlocked with scrambles by friends (who also need to have Scrambls).
What good is waiting on that halo-wearing agent if you're still sitting on a book you wrote ten years ago? Try publishing in smaller markets or different venues, like nonfiction, short story, or flash fiction. Every little success adds to your self-esteem as a career writer.
Well, just like I'd predicted in a previous post, our little man decided he was going to pick his own birthday, instead of having us pick for him and have to be induced like we were with Alli. Alli became a big sister on Wednesday, April 18th at 11:51 a.m. to Aiden Ringling Meibers. He weighed in at 8 lbs 1 oz and measured 21 1/4 inches long. Let's back up and take a look at how he decided to make his arrival. Yeah buddy!
Me: (guiltily) "Yeah."
' Or walk with Kings - nor lose the common touch,
The choir’s going to sing, and the hearse will roll
Good evening,managed to get a card done for a few challenges last night. I've been dying to join in with some of the challenges for a while but just been so busy with christmas cards I just have'nt been able to but I am nearly at the end of my list so I thought I'd take time out to make a card for a challenge eventhough it's another christmas card lol.
It’s the venomous looks of strangers. It’s the sense of embarrassment when your child is running up and down the floor of the pub, even though it’s because he’s been sitting still for over an hour and can’t manage it any longer. It’s weighing up whether it’s even worth explaining the situation to the people staring at you in Next. It’s apologising to the Sunday School teachers. It’s getting chucked out of British Heart Foundation because the chap with learning difficulties has been left running the shop on his own and doesn’t like the fact that your son is behind the curtain in the empty changing cubicle, even though he’s not actually doing anything.
To start them off on the right foot, I thought I’d ask my journalist friends on Facebook whether they could think of any common howlers a PR newbie might want to avoid.
Yes, I do. I am a painter. The reason painting was the subject of his dream? Well, I had recently had breast cancer and was struggling with life issues and the question of why I had always panicked whenever I started to get immersed in painting. I knew I was supposed to paint, but would always pull back. I went and had some past life regression done through a highly qualified therapist. I was hypnotized. I found myself in a room with a table that had a candle lit on it. Gastien was kind of leaning back against the table. It was the first time I met him. Now, I am not saying if I was Gastien or if “creative energy” was released in me after those sessions, but after that I started receiving “downloads” or information in dreams and during daytime hours about his life. It would happen at work, while eating, at any time. The “downloads” were intense and detailed. The therapist said that would likely happen for a few weeks. It kept on for a month. I know Gastien existed. The name “Gastien” came to me during the first session. I picked “Beauchamp” for the last name. It was obvious he needed closure and healing; that he wanted his story known. That is why I say he wrote the story. I simply placed my hands on the keyboard for an hour every day, five days a week and let him talk. His story was much darker than what he gave me for the books. I think he told it how he wished it could have been, without losing the main core of who he was and what happened. Both book 1 and 2 were written at the same time. I think was his way of saying “I wish I could have had it a little easier” and “I wish I could have communicated to people that mattered a little better.” Still, he shared a lot of his flaws no matter how they would be taken. When I wrote the book I thought I would not share how it was written or those experiences I had. It is very uncomfortable to lie, though. I tell the truth or hint at it. Heck, I am an artist so many people think I am nuts anyway! Another reason I felt hesitant to do so was that I did not want to cheapen my experience by making it sound like a publicity stunt. It isn’t. It was real, it was gut-wrenching and it was enlightening. Ultimately, it is sacred to me. To lie cheapens it more than telling the truth. People will have to assume what they want. When I am dying it will matter very little what strangers assumed about me anyway. Staying true to my soul is what is important. Sounds a lot like Gastien, doesn’t it?
About 30 metres further through some really dense and scratchy bushes you will come to the best bit which is the big trestle bridge that crosses a creek , here there are several foundation blocks and 2 large piers made of concrete spanning across the sandstone creek bed ( you can see this from Google Earth ) I then climbed up the other side and continued to follow the raised path again through some spectacular bushland as it wound its way round the mountain curves.
Format – 297 x 210mm
Claire said, “the most spine-tingling thing about the venture was the first time I saw a card on the web that had my stamps on it and wasn't made by me! That was surreal! Then seeing our stuff on cards that were in magazines was just awesome! Having said that though, the thing that makes me happiest is the amount of lovely people I have met - I was a stay at home mum, with a very limited social life and now I literally have buddies all over the world! How cool is that!”
Don't forget to visit all blogs, become a follower and leave a comment on every blog to be eligible to win the giveaways!!! We will have 10 WINNERS!!!
Serve with fresh fruit, milk, yogourt, maple syrup or to your liking!
Do you sleep in on weekends?
There are specific precautions however that we all used universally. If someone was bleeding due to a menstrual period or if semen had gotten on the sheets because someone was unable to hold their composure during the massage, we were told to throw away the sheets immediately and disinfect the bed.
* Inside gated village
As a child I loved mixing things up when I got the chance in the kitchen, a lot of my love for cooking came from my grandmother, although a lot of her cooking was very heavy. I have grown over the years to love to cook with fresh veggies and mix unique things together which create a wonderful flavor. When my oldest was old enough to help out in the kitchen I encouraged her to jump in and help as I feel this helped create a basic understanding of cooking, skill and taught her a bit about creativity.
Today, the Papertrey Stamp Designers are supposed to be sharing our favorite stamp set with you. As a mom to six, there is no real way for me to choose a *favorite*. Like my spectacular six, each of my stamp sets is unique and fun in its own way. It's so hard to choose a favorite stamp set. Last year I had several sets come out and the year was quite a whirlwind for me - with Todd and Karen's traumatic injuries - and life in general. As their healing started to plateau and I got back into crafting, the time I felt most creative was when I was working with Lock and Key. I created in *THE ZONE* and it seems that every single time I took that set out - magic was unlocked (pardon the pun). If you want to see my favorite Lock & Key posts, click {here}.
To make matters worse, there’s a Waffen SS unit on their tail — and they’re caught in a violent feud between two warring Italian mountain clans!
Don't be shy and contacts the discounted disney vacation packages of the cheapest disney vacation packages. Children love family holiday park is top notch too, with an abundance of one-bedrooms Disney rental homes-basically their function is to search the disney vacation packages canada a destination and look for villas that have the discounted disney vacation packages. Amenities will include baths, swimming pools, water slides, tennis and basketball courts, hiking and biking trails, entertainment and activities for the discounted disney vacation packages, restaurants, dining and shopping options, and even save money.
And sometimes this dialogue continues: me sincerely inviting, them hearing demands, me proposing, them hearing shoulds and shouldn’ts, me honestly requesting, them hearing orders, me wanting to empower them and their power of choice, them hearing restrictions and limitations… Sometimes it takes days, sometimes it takes weeks for them to start hearing my message…
The stylist George Cortina kids about falling into fashion because he couldn't find another job, but in reality, styling is all he ever wanted to do. "I saw the first book of portraits that Avedon did when I was very young and nearly lost my mind," he says. "I wanted to live in that world." Knowing what he wants has worked out well for Cortina, who counts Roberto Cavalli, Comme des Garçons and Levi's as clients. He is also the fashion director of L'Uomo Vogue, and his work has appeared in this country in Vanity Fair and V. More recently, he styled Valentino's men's show in Milan last month. For "Surface Tension," he joins up with the photographer Paolo Roversi, whom he admires for being "able to capture the mystery in a woman."
So what is left for policy makers to work with post Regional Spatial Strategies? Well the Coalition Government has created Enterprise Zones (announced in the March 2011 Budget and offering discounts in business rates, simplification of the planning system, superfast broadband, enhanced capital allowances for firms that focus on high value manufacturing, use of Tax Incremental Finance and support from UK Trade and Investment for inward investment and trade opportunities). In this global market place we need to compete internationally and other countries offer similar incentives for firms to locate. National and local support for business is vital to help them set-up, grow, access finance, innovate, network, train workers, export and compete in the global market place. Enhancing the regional skills base is critical and further support for education was mentioned in the Budget in the form of funding for work experience places, apprenticeships and the expansion of University Technical Colleges. Incentives to business and investment in education are essential to sustain growth of an economy, help the environment and rebalance wealth from the overcrowded regions within our nation.
Flowers / gems / silver corner charm are Wild Orchid Crafts.
This is Ame.
Our program has as its basis the needs of the masses and the best way of mobilising them as well as exposing their class enemies elements including:
I am enough
Building relationships develops a foundation for effectively leading others. It also starts to break down organizational silos as people connect across the lines between their job descriptions or departments. The more barriers come down and relationships deepen, the broader the foundation for leading others becomes.
Level of Tsundere: Dippin’ Dots
RTS has shaped me profoundly, and I feel like I am walking in a dream because I now get to call these professors my colleagues, and I get to join them in the work they have already been doing for a long time. Thanks be to God.
You shall be together when the white wings of death scatter your days.
Women from past generations have suffered and fought for the women of this generation. For this I am eternally grateful. I have choices, freedom and to some extent a liberal world I can enjoy (with a few exceptions).
When dinner wasn't ready on time:
This book was published by Jones Harvest in 2008 and the ranking on Amazon is #3,894,935. So if this is the first book on the first line giving it “prime time viewing,” you can imagine how well the others are selling—NOT. And yet, people are PAYING for those SPOTS?
Piero Nasuti
here is footage of that direct hit from INSIDE the airport from April 22, 2011 …
You can pick up tons of product at fabulous prices through the Funkie Junkie Boutique. New items are added everyday. There are now nearly 400 products in the boutique, including over 220 Tim Holtz/Ranger products at really terrific savings! And right now through the end of April, for orders of $75 or more, Linda will split the shipping 50/50 with you, including international shipping. That's a fabulous deal!
4. Isaiah 53 in the Four Gospels
So, thanks for loving me even though I cost you a lot of stress and money this week. Especially after you had to buy a new air conditioner for the house. (Thanks for letting me get a prime spot in front of the fan all week while the air was out. It felt really nice.)
We ventured in, joining the masses of the righteous on four wheels.
Ultra Vivid Scene Special one UK
as flawless as I always try to make it look when I’m around..
Some people don’t need to fail to learn. But most of us do. Without failure, we will never learn to do the right things. Without failure we will never have the courage to keep on going, even when it’s not necessarily the “easy” thing to do. It’s hard to admit, but in order to meet success, failure must be our best friend.
Welcome. Ok, let’s get down to it.
I wrote this week about how the Lord has revealed to me my story. My story parallels that of the Isrealites who were on this cycle of believing, complaining & wrestling, not believing and then back to believing again. Essentially they were struggling with the idea of REAL. Was God real? Is God real?
Take courage, friend--you must press on; the victory’s in reach,
Today I had a lesson with the Don Sachey, one of the greats of the times of old and former teammate of Bruce Davidson and Jim Wofford. I must admit that I definitely had a bit of a mental block for what I would consider my first real dressage lesson since mid-May. I told Don this and he said, "just ride like you normally would. Pretend I'm not even here."
All on tap.
Mahek: – What happened to your girl-friend. You two were very much in love. What happened to the girl who had “taken you up”. (These words definitely seems to be seasoned with jealousy)
Well..I called her and with the most serious professional voice I could muster, walked her through turning her telephone pole back on. Maybe technology isn’t for everyone.
I'd be lying if I said that these things don't frighten me a bit. But the truth is that, most of the time, I have an incredible peace about it all. I'm grateful that we can provide this surgery for Mei. I am grateful that I can be there with her... that this time God chose me to be there to hold Mei and remind her she is not alone.
This is an accurate description, as far as it goes. But Neil MacGregor, the director of British Museum, explains the real point of the exercise:
TOKIO – 見上げた流星 (I was just on twitter asking when will they grace us with a new album lol. They truly are a gem within JE imo. If I’m being completely honest (and not biased like I usually am) I would say this is the best release from any JE group/artist this year.)
Nous espérons que vous êtes déjà allé consulter le site Web de notre prochain congrès qui aura lieu à Canmore, en Alberta, du 14 au 16 mai. Si ce n’est pas encore fait… à vos souris!
1 can (15 oz) garbanzo beans (also called chick peas)
I grew up on a farm in Iowa. I always wanted to write (see #3). I loved riding ponies in the fields, and I missed that when I grew up and moved away. I think that’s why I became a runner, and then a cyclist—because I still needed the feeling of moving through the air outside. I have run marathons and raced my bike. I still race a little bit. Right now, I live in the country, and I have a Newfoundland dog named Freya who weighs 170 pounds. She’s bigger than I am! I also teach English, Humanities, Creative Writing, and Children’s Literature at South Central College in North Mankato. I write all summer and every chance I get.
For each letter I’ve created a handwriting/poem sheet. We read the poem together, highlight the letter Ii’s in the poem, and then finger-trace how to make the letters. Then we trace the letters with either a crayon or chunky pencil.
Film: Call of the Yukon
2 tsp. vanilla extract or desired flavoring (I like almond myself)
During 2011, SafetyFirst processed tens of thousands of motorist observation reports for our 3800+ active clients. 3.81% of all reports mentioned improper cell phone use. At first glance, that may look like a low number, but what’s more significant is that it represents a 20% INCREASE in complaints for cells/texting over CY2010. Despite the increase in complaints about improper use of electronics, it remains a relatively minor contributor to the total number of road deaths when split out from the much broader category of “distracted driving”.
It is my belief that Obama is extraordinarily vulnerable to defeat, but that has given rise to another commonly expressed Republican fear; that the Democrats will steal the election with ACORN-style tactics at the polls.
I've got to go now. Time to prepare for a trip to Boston to perform. . . I'll see you and Grandma in my dreams.
- metal tassel
Sokurov’s Faust can be a rich experience for a patient viewer who would try to see the film more than once to glimpse the lodes of gold in the cinematic mine that the film offers. Aronofsky and the jury that he headed at the Venice Festival could obviously evaluate the dense value of the film in its script, in its actors’ performances, in its cinematography, and in its music.
The Good News:
Let love lead us, love is Christmas.
Level 20: STR: +60, Increases your attack speed.
Someone who has experienced some cognitive decline may feel embarrassed when he or she gets confused and can’t remember an important detail, especially in front of a group of people. If the whole family is telling stories and reminiscing together, don’t single out the person with dementia by asking a detail-oriented question like ”Dad, do you remember what you said to Mom on our camping trip when she backed the car into a tree?” Instead, ask a broader, open-ended question like ”Dad, do you have a favorite memory about the camping trips we went on?” to encourage sharing without quizzing.
Today, the home state of 2 or 3 lines -- the People's Republic of Maryland -- is holding primary elections (as are Wisconsin and the District of Columbia). So 2 or 3 lines thought the time was right to kick off a series of posts featuring songs that relate in some way to politics in general and the November 6 general election in particular.
A stay or retention bonus is a simple concept and is commonly used during mergers or acquisitions of large companies. However, they are also applicable in the small family owned business arena as the impact of key employee loss or turnover can have a devastating effect on the business. In the small business context, the stay bonus is simply a contractual agreement between the business and select key employees that the company will pay a bonus if the employees stay for a period of time after a triggering event such as the retirement, death or disability of the business owner. By having the promise of a bonus at the end of the retention period, key employees may be more likely to remain with the company during transition, which may make the difference between future success and failure particularly if the transition was unplanned such as on the owner’s untimely death.
I seek your face in the crowd.
‘I’m only going to lend her my robe.’
The bride is a real girly girl, so the frou frou dress on the front of the card I made for her seems appropriate. The heels and tiara seem right too. The painted clothespin will hold the card on the package. The original idea is from Pinterest.
Here’s a part of Paris you’ve probably never seen.
What terrible thing would happen if the orphan hunters got him? "Selling him to the textile mills" doesn't tell us why he doesn't want that.
Those who followed the trial closely might enjoy the book, there are some interesting details given about the case which were not revealed in court. But I would argue that the definitive work on the “trial of the century” has yet to be written.
It is enough.
Place the pecan halves in clusters of 5 (1 for the head, 2 for the arms, 2 for the legs) onto silpats. You should get about 28-30 turtles. I didn't have halves, so I used chopped pecans and just made clumps. They didn't look quite as nice, but they tasted just as good!
Aer Lingus and Etihad are engaged in discussions which to date have focused on reciprocal code-share opportunities. Future discussions may explore additional commercial and cost opportunities to develop a closer working relationship in areas such as joint procurement. Aer Lingus views these discussions as a natural progression of its successful Greenfield cost reduction program. There can be no certainty as to the outcome of these discussions.”
“But how do we lift ourselves up so that we can be like the branches in the sky?” I asked. Pointing to the sky, I said, “I want to be up there. How do I get there?”
Afternoon everybody.....just a quickie post as im not feeling 100% today..all the excitment at reaching 21 again yesterday...lol!!!! i managed to finish my little distress inked image last night and thought him a cutie...really am enjoying the inks and had to order some new paper....as have nearlly run out but as its all new to me im practising and just get to the final bit of colouring and what do i do ...yeah muck it up so have to sart again but we all gotta start somewhere....
was admitted to the hospital on Monday.
Only thus can ye come to the Light.
My parents modeled reading, as well. Mommy spent hours at her desk, reading scholarly books related to her work as a teacher and music historian. Daddy, after a long day in the physics lab, would settle into a comfy chair after supper and disappear behind the New York Times or Scientific American. My parents subscribed to Life magazine, and I “read” the pictures before I could read the words. We got The New Yorker, too, and by twelve I was reading it cover to cover. There weren’t many YA books back then, so at that point I moved on to books for adults and never looked back.
A future post will discuss so stay tuned...
Tomorrow is going to be interesting. It is day 6. Normally I do my workout when I get home from my day job. However, tomorrow is the day I also work my overnight shift…so when I get home, I need to rest. Luckily it is a Rev Abs day, and it requires no equipment. In other words I can bring it to work with me.
My goals for next week…
In other words, Brave New World doesn’t have quite the literary consistency of 1984 or The Handmaid’s Tale. But when reading a deceased author’s perception of the world in, well, about 2011, it’s hard not to get engrossed. There are several pages towards the end of the book—the aforementioned conversation between the Controller and the Savage—that on their own make Brave New World worth reading (and from which I will post some excerpts in coming days). Also, I imagine the book does itself more justice than did the 1998 TV-movie adaptation starring Peter Gallagher. Which…I may or may not have just added to my Netflix queue.
These little gems are tougher than they look, they are made in white stoneware, fired to 1200 degrees celcius and then glazed, so they are durable. The bonus is they are priced under R80 so they also make wonderfully affordable gifts.
Samuel Medley
"Without commitment, you aren't motivated. After the first setbacks or obstacles, you'll probably quit. So the first rule of New Year Resolutions is to only make resolutions that you can commit to – don't make them because it is 'the thing to do', or because someone has told you that you should...
McCoy: 1645 passes, 70.3% CMP, 6.8% TD, 2.7% INT, 8.1 YPA, 11.5 YPC, 155.0 rating
Thanks so much to everyone who participated in this challenge. Your entries were all wonderful! If you were in the Top 3 and would like our Top 3 blinkie, just send us an email at the address in the sidebar.
I love this site because it's actually realistic steps that you can take instead of crash dieting and taking pills. Trust me, I've tried those. I've incorporated 5-7 of these steps into my week 1 plan and then I'll add some new ones next week.
Beer Style: Russian Imperial Stout
I swapped out our usual beige sheets (which were too close to the wall colour), and went with a light blue. I tried to find the lightest feeling sheets, because I know these will be the ones we'll use this summer and it will get hot in there. We decided to keep the same IKEA duvet cover I've been using for the last 5 years because...
Who else hates the word amazeballs? That makes me want to throw up and simultaneously punch whomever says it to me. You’ve been warned.
Butterfly - 6.4M
Unbelievable, that I could reach my age without ever having read Dickens’ classic. I’ve seen movie versions (Alistair Sim’s 1951 Scrooge is my favorite, followed closely by Bill Murray’s 1988 Scrooged), heard radio versions, and seen TV specials. But I’ve never actually picked up the book.
After arriving, we ended up staying three nights at Hualien11, a hostel catering to both Taiwanese and foreign travellers. Lisa and “Little Boss,” her son, treated us to a home-cooked meal with dishes of snails stir-fried with ginger, chilli and basil, and squid stir-fried with celery. When she found out that our travels are also our honeymoon, she even moved us out of our budget room into the luxury suite for the last evening!
John turned to her momentarily. His face seemed unreadable to her, almost unfamiliar. She thought he was about to say something. But he didn't.
The census information for Ireland is also available online through the University of Southampton. It’s a little more convoluted to get there than I remember it from previously as you need to search their library catalogue for, say, EPPI Ireland 1851 census and you will then select whichever county you’re interested in. However as yet I’ve been unable to locate the raw data online that I had previously been able to download. Lucky I’ve saved Clare data already!
By nature, I am a woman who looks for the straightest line between two points. The one point is where I am and the other is where I want to be. I am a doer. I want to check it off my list and I want it to stay checked. :) I want to drive the shortest, and fastest way to the store or the school. I want to order my life so that it works at maximum efficiency.
I am rambling about Mr Gary Barlow, lead singer of Take That, former X factor judge and national treasure in the making..
Michael Devine - My style would be “Old Chateau”. This is inspired by the privileges I have had to visit, and in some cases stay in some wonderful old European family “houses” where the furniture is museum quality, but hasn't been redone for generations and has had time to mellow and develop a patina that comes with time. I try to translate that into what I design.
Not recently. I used to have pet frogs, newts, and fish as a kid. But some people dear to me have just brought a puppy into their home, so I expect I'll be seeing her often and she'll be sort of like a pet to me too. Except I'm not the one paper-training her right now, thankfully.
A little something worth noting: A little while ago I changed my Twitter & Tumblr login info/usernames but Path was synced to the old ones but there wasn’t an in-app way to change or reset even after revoking Path from Tumblr and Twitter. One day I saw an update from a friend on my Twitter and clicked the link going to path on the web, where at last I saw an answer! There was a settings tab and I managed to disconnect my Tumblr and Twitter on there. So if you’re in a bind about this as well, go to www.path.com/settings to reset your auto-share settings
Gretchen and her brother, after having their sister stolen away by a vicious, hungry witch that they unwisely sought out in a dark forest several years previously, are not in the best of mental health. But since this book does not particularly target the issue of mental health, they are packed off onto a road trip with the vague destination of the ocean. However, not mental trauma but car troubles take them only as far as tiny, old-fashioned town, stuck behind the times by the barricade of trees which in turn hide many dangerous creatures, like racoons and rabbits and werewolves, or so I’m told. Stranded though they might be, they don’t seem to have any intention of leaving, drawn in not only by the delicious whiff but the kind and welcoming personality of Sophia Kelly, a lonely girl who runs a chocolatier. There might be a reason why she has so few friends, or it might be unfounded but I can assure that something is not entirely as it seems in this quant, back-water town. In retrospect, this town really needs a therapist.
Going through the various articles associated with doing so, one particular duty of the ‘Director’ made me pause and reflect.
Didn't the colors turn out beautiful? I thought so. We didn't use all the paint in the morning and just covered the muffin tin with wax paper and put it in the fridge to paint again after nap. A couple of the paints were harder than others, so I just added a touch of water to those ones.
“ARI seeks to spearhead a cultural renaissance that will reverse the anti-reason, anti-individualism, anti-freedom, anti-capitalist trends in today’s culture. The major battleground in this fight for reason and capitalism is the educational institutions—high schools and, above all, the universities, where students learn the ideas that shape their lives…To date, more than 1.4 million copies of these Ayn Rand novels have been donated to 30,000 teachers in 40,000 classrooms across the United States and Canada.
I do love to decorate this porch for the different seasons,
What has this experience done for me? As I have recognized
For me the same applies in photography! If your portrait is going to be taken, get ready for your close-up and remember it is a good thing 'to not like to be photographed', lol!
Make a thick sticky liquid with sugar and vinegar.
But you served us well
People always look for the familiar, especially in the things that are foreign to them; but there will be times when the unfamiliar works its way into our lives and become something we grow to love. Such is my story with plum cakes. Or this particular one, in fact. I don’t believe I have ever eaten plums in any other way than au naturel, quartered into half-moons; or dried, in the form of prunes. When I saw this recipe for plum cakes, I was skeptical. Do plums really play well in a cake? They have such a unique flavour on their own already. I was a bit nervous if we would actually like the results.
Cook until golden brown, approximately 2 to 3 minutes on each side.
You can see that my leather has right and wrong
From Nahncee:
So what's the point of the article? A criticism of bad architecture? There's an old saying doctors bury their mistakes but architects live in theirs. While not exactly true, reinforced concrete has given architects a lot of leeway.
In the front of our building, is a huge old Plane tree.
“Quite so,” Mr Marshall Marshall replied in his velvety tone, “not many are.”
Preheat oven to 450 degrees. Spray a baking sheet with cooking spray.
Forgive me for having fun with this challenge. Grumpy Napoleon (obviously not in the mood for hanky-panky) is from a painting by Paul Delaroche, his Josephine is a combination of a couple of Google images. One look at this Napoleon and the words "Not tonight, Josephine!" came to mind.
“…convened the judges of the Sanhedrin and brought before them a man named James, the brother of Jesus who was called the Christ, and certain others. He accused them of having transgressed the law and delivered them up to be stoned.
No temptation has overtaken you but such as is common to man; and God is faithful, who will not allow you to be tempted beyond what you are able, but with the temptation will provide the way of escape also, so that you will be able to endure it.
Never a dull moment.
Cast: Matt Damon, Joan Allen, David Strathairn, Julia Stiles
"Ill leave it until I've got the house tidy"
In the meantime, Chris Kelworth has Tagged me in a Q&A meme. Chris is one of the most intriguing sci-fi authors I've met here in the blogs. His worlds are unique and interesting, as well developed as his range of characters and their plots. A Save The Cat enthusiast, he seems to put everything he learns into his writing, and it turns out well. Be sure to visit Chris and offer him your support.
The D&SNGRR is history made up of original equipment, maintained to perfection, operated and kept up by people today using skills long lost to ordinary endeavors. Our history protects and preserves the very human character that made our country great. On our railroad, you will experience Colorado at its best…wildlife, waterfalls, majestic peaks, all from the view of an 1880s train. You will see places you can get to only by foot or train. You will experience first-hand why the D&SNGRR was voted “One of the World’s Top Ten Most Exciting Train Rides” by the Society of American Travel Writers in 2009. The most important part of our mission is you. It is to give you an experience you will never forget. Riding the D&SNGRR you are now a part of history. You are now an 1882 railroader. Welcome Aboard! We’re glad you’re here. –Allen & Carol Harper
Trendsetting Color Palette of Jewel Tones, Metallics and
Job Description:
a BONUS I received when I became an eagle watcher---One
Break-ins are not uncommon in Oslo. While there is a feeling of general safety, pick-pockets have become increasingly active in the downtown area, and last summer's and fall's spike of rape attacks had the whole city on edge. But I've never felt the fear of being openly robbed, or mugged, in broad daylight. I think I look out for myself well enough.
@hollyblack Write to please your reader self, not to please your writer self.
That they ARE coming true.
I got a rejection this morning and it was like water off a duck's back. The reason was a combination of a) I didn't love love love the agent, only liked him lots and b) I expected to get the rejection. Not in a pessimistic way, but in a realistic way. That's how I'm feeling, realistic. Lots of people will reject my ms. I only need one person to love it (though if it could be 2 or 3, I'd be psyched.)
They were ordered through Franklin Mint I had to wait 2 months before receiving the next one.
That’s right. My seven-year-old loves this guy more than me.
Triad Strategies sits down with College Speaker, Music Producer and Music Coach Loren Weisman for a first 3 minutes segment with Triad Strategies. In this video, these first three minutes cover three questions about the elements of what Loren brings to schools, colleges and universities that he speaks at to help students get on the right path as they venture in to the new music business of today.
My mom was here last week for her annual March visit for Chloe's birthday, which was this past Sunday. (Ack!!! I am just now realizing I didn't do a birthday post!)
I am describing my first visit to the New England Real Ale Exhibition (NERAX), sponsored by the Cask-Conditioned Ale Support Campaign (CASC)--that is a pintful of acronyms. It really is kind of ridiculous that it is my first visit to this annual beer festival.
Hiya Sweeties! Happy Wednesday to you! This morning we are busy little bees, getting my mom packed up and ready to head to the airport. We’ve had a nice long visit, but it’s always a bit hard to say goodbye. Luckily, it won’t be too long before summer is here, and we’ll be packing up ourselves and heading to California for our annual vacation.
They all finally start to go away
2. Pour this puree in deep vesel and add 7-8 cups of water.
“Enslaved is one of the most amazing bands to ever come from Norway. We’ve had the pleasure of working with them on their last two albums in North America, and from this day forth worldwide.
NO!! Walter! DON'T RING THAT BELL!!!.
Went back home last night, where I’ll be staying for the next month. Glad to say that I didn’t forget the little family “dance” (short step, short step, long step over the weak spots in the floor), so I didn’t go through the floor… I’ll count that as a success.
Finn handed a piece of wood to each of the two men before him and watched as they focused their will. The tips of each sliver of wood burst into flame. I started noticeably whereupon Moira placed a steadying hand on my arm. Each of the two men chose a circle of wood and placed the sliver inside the expertly laid bunch. Everyone held their breath until each stack caught flame and burned brightly. Just as in the airplane cabin, a collective breath of relief filled the air about us. And when I looked back to the apple tree, the three figures had disappeared. I shook my head in wonderment. Had I really just seen them standing there after all?
INDEPENDENCE FOREVER
Each year one freshman is honored with this glorious chapeau.
reading nook - check
(Dear Everyone: Eating meat is not bad for you if your body can't metabolize non-heme iron. In that case, NOT eating meat is really REALLY bad for you. Just saying.)
3. Place the sliced mozzarella over the pizza dough in an even layer. Pile the asparagus shavings over the top of the mozzarella. Dot the surface of the pizza with the garlic herb cheese. Season with kosher salt and pepper.
Bethel is where Jacob went to hide from Esau. After he took that birthright and the blessing from Isaac he fled. But he would not have had to have fled if he had not stolen the birthright. It is quite a story and reveals so much of God’s loving and wonderful in wisdom mind.
So, bye. Karin Marie :)
Ian Holm (The Sweet Hereafter)
I'm so excited to now have 300 wonderful followers and congratulations Annie for being #300. I'll be getting a little surprise in the mail to her once she sends me her addy. Will also be posting a Follower Candy Only for all my amazing friends and followers as soon as the Blog Anniversary Candy ends, but it won't last long so be sure to check back. Think I can only keep up with one candy at a time.
You are a concrete troubadour, tipping your cap
to appreciate the goodness in each moment…
6. He understands that if you don’t have you Skinny Vanilla Soy Latte by 4 p.m., he should look for you in the supply closet where you carved out a perfectly-comfortable nap space.
As soon as my son fell asleep I was angry all over again and when I saw a canvas in the closet I started painting. It was hard to do lettering with shaky hands but I managed and it felt good to acknoweledge my anger. If I write an angry letter or pick up the phone to scream into it nothing good will come out of it. I have to walk a fine line to avoid upsetting the person who constantly upsets me. He has just stopped paying if I make him mad before, twice in December. Happy fucking holidays.
Abdullah said the salary increase for the 1,002,040 civil servants would cost the government RM3.4 billion this year or an additional annual expenditure of RM6.8 billion.
It is full of quotations from one of the main documents of Vatican II and was written by a man who was at Vatican II, helped implement Vatican II and spent his life standing up to tyranny and despotic governments
I must bend out;
“On the eve of Passover they hanged Yeshu. And an announcer went out, in front of him, for forty days (saying): ‘He is going to be stoned because he practiced sorcery and enticed and led Israel astray. Anyone who knows anything in his favor, let him come and plead in his behalf.’ But, not having found anything in his favor, they hanged him on the eve of the Passover.”
Just as I had made the decision to admit defeat and add this to the brown bin, we happened to make a trip to The Range (tagline: 'if we don't sell it, you don't need it'). Out the back in the gardening section was this:
Bafana Bafana face New Zealand in a do-or-die battle tonight.
Ten-dollar-a-week stenographers take letters from
I’m sorry, my columns normally come out on a Saturday, things just kept coming up, I really did keep meaning to get around to it… Some unknown smart aleck once remarked, “Only Robinson Crusoe had everything done by Friday”. That line must be one of the most insightful drolls in human history. Some of our race’s greatest works of literature were written about procrastination, or at least they would have been if someone had ever gotten around to writing them.
We read blogs and stories of families who choose to adopt, who support special needs adoptions or foster children, or raise money for good causes (like funds for medical care to The Bad Place), and perhaps we get stuck in our thinking of, "I can't do anything. Someone else will do it."
I won’t go into detail about these Librarians…I will save that for a later post. But as we close National Poetry Month, I want to spotlight a poem written by one of my favorite Poets, Nikki Giovanni. This poem captures how I felt about Librarians as a child and how much they fueled my love for literature and writing:
I am overwhelmed at my actions,
What is the most recent book you've read that you absolutely loved?
Note: If you don't see the digis when you click on our Facebook page, you simply need to click on the Welcome link on the left sidebar of the page. That will take you to the right spot to download the digis!
In that regard, this story challenges the 1970s all-time zany “Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy” by Douglas Adams. However, while Hitchhiker’s Guide was written as a spoof, “Symbiota Sapiens is a serious adventure and love story with zany overtones.
Tel: (021) 739 4018 or 726 1570
What? Why? Are you planning on funding her college? Would you ask another child's mother that? Of course she does....and if she doesn't...they're are reasons why that are more personal or painful than you can ever imagine so drop it. Instead....you may ask how old she is, or just change your wording to something you would ask another family like,"Oh does she go to Gracemore? I wonder if she knows my niece Sally."
I roasted them till tender but still holding their shape
Right before boarding the plane, we got a super fun announcement. Our flight had been chosen for a special extra security measure check! Mother. Fucking. Awesome.
My Wednesday post about my life in Japan...
Produced and engineered by Joe Bull, European Toys.
Amazingly, you can't actually see it unless you look up close. See the first picture? The crack isn't visible. But its there and its huge and I'm not happy about it!
Now, the interesting thing is that this either means that yes, they’re both human. OR, they’re both cylons and Andrew was just helping Mink keep his cover. Or maybe Andrew could be a cylon just trying to get the Admiral to really think he’s a human. So, as you can probably imagine, people are paying very close attention to what people do in these situations, trying to guage what could possibly be going on.
He neither choose to meet her, nor expect it to bring him such happiness.
Use that CM’s mandate dad nepotistically gave to END APARTHEID, send delegations to UN to end apartheid not flounder around being all ‘CM’mish’. VIPs are only VIPs by what they do. What are you doing about 2nd class citizenships in Malaysia? Nothing? WTF are you doing in Dewan otherwise especially without a quorum to justify your CM’s post? Speak on APARTHEID or be a KTK II. Equality only!
1 cup of basmati rice (makes 4, 1/2 cup servings)
Bearing the above in mind, the career of Dudley's The Montanas (also signed to Pye along with everyone's favourite Muswell Hill band) is perplexing to any student of pop. From 1965- 1969 they were allowed to release eight singles, and also had this one reissued once in order to see if it had more luck on its second outing. This was a perplexing amount of faith to show a band which, from its beat beginnings right to its sunshine pop end, never really showed much sales potential. Two things probably acted in the band's favour. Firstly, their beat take on harmony pop was incredibly middle of the road and subsequently enjoyed some airplay during the period. Besides that, reports from the frontline of the era would suggest they were also a versatile live act, as likely to please social and supper club audiences with music and comedy as they were Carnaby Street kids, and it's possible that Pye executives may have hoped that some of that crowd-pleasing ability would cross over into sales of physical product. This is a case of "citation needed" to the power of a hundred, obviously, but calculated guesswork is all we have in this peculiar case.
On a hope and a prayer, the Ides of March RIS double batch (MB0016, 0017) will FINALLY be transferred to secondary, freeing up our primary vessels for some more brewin'. I've had the itch to brew for about two weeks now, but no place to put it. Hopefully we can move onto The Missionary Position Belgian Strong Ale (MB0018) and Stone Soup Porter (MB0019).
1. In the cavity of each of the cleaned fish place 1 of each of the ingredients listed above and wrap tightly in the foil.
Supports the venue and our non profit efforts.
lively singing and dancing, the message is that through
Strawberries hand cut then embossed on the 'wrong' side with Swiss dot folder.
and tossing it into night
Is cornering me to the edge of this cliff
I actually have two! The first and last teachers in my schooling; my Kindergarten teacher, Mrs. Andrews, and my senior year teacher at the vo-tech school, Mrs. Musselman. Mrs. Andrews was everything a Kindergarten teacher should be! Kind, fun, and loving. I remember her husband used to come visit the school, and we thought he was the coolest thing ever! You see, Mr. Andrews competed in Mr. America competitions and was the largest man we had ever seen!
And we the people keep feeding the monkeys instead of starving them!
Should it surprise us that the true story, like the movie, does involve the writing of Romeo and Juliet, Shakespeare's most romantic play? What follows is what may well be the true story, about half fact, half best guess, pieced together from contemporary documents, the works of historians, of literary historians and commentators, of Shakespeare experts, some orthodox, some necessarily radical, and the plays themselves. And if we add some spice in the telling, who's to say us nay? Certainly not Shakespeare.
Enter Gen. Leonard Wood, whom President William McKinley had named military governor of Cuba, bearing provisions that became known as the Platt Amendment. Two were particularly odious: one guaranteed the United States the right to intervene at will in Cuban affairs; the other provided for the sale or lease of naval stations. Juan Gualberto Gómez, a leading delegate to the Cuban Constitutional Convention, said the amendment would render Cubans “a vassal people.” Foreshadowing the Cuban Missile Crisis, he presciently warned that foreign bases on Cuban soil would only draw Cuba “into conflict not of our own making and in which we have no stake.”
First official order of business, is to commend our sisters, Payton and Suki, who were very busy over the holiday. They are seated in the Sunflower chair of honor to recognize them for their most awesome score. They have really outdone themselves with this one girls, and I think you will agree.
Back at the house I unloaded Daisy girl and put her back in her pasture. She immediately took off to go find her girlfriend, maybe to tell her about her strange day?? Most likely to go eat grass, ;)
Elinros Lindal is the founder and creative director of ELLA, she's the company's CEO and production manager. Basically, she is someone who had a dream and worked hard to make it come true. Before launching her own label in 2011 she entered the MBA program of Reykjavik University and along her studies she assembled a team and worked on creating her first clothing line. Her goals and priorities were clearly in order because it was only one year after her graduation that ELLA was launched, and welcomed by Icelandic women looking for timeless and classic items to add to their wardrobe.
I hope the few followers that I have will tune in this week. Here is a tenative goal list for posting. Christmas Tree (all vintage), Mitchell (my darling 13 yo son) hunting experience, a get together of coworkers to make 500 christmas tags using my "stash" for a Ramsey County/St. Paul Police charitable organization we call OPERATION SANTA. http://www.operationsanta.net/ I'll explain it all later in the coming days.
Perhaps Obama can order the exhumation of hundreds of millions of victims of jihadi wars, land appropriations, cultural annihilations and enslavements in an effort to purge the truth, the reality, from history.
Following Alex, Susan McCaw briefly discussed her and Craig’s long-time belief in mobile technology as a solution to economic development. She commented on the importance of dignified solutions like the Village Phone program, where individuals get the opportunity to earn income for themselves while offering a valuable service to individuals in their community. She also drew on her experience as an ambassador, implying that “micro solutions,” like those supported by Grameen Foundation, actually have the potential to help solve “macro problems” like global security.
Hey there everyone, it's your old pal Diary here to admit defeat. Over the past few months I haven't posted much, read many blogs or tweeted worth a shit. Things are just too crazy. So I feel that it's best to fold up camp for this particular little blog concern and think about what might be ahead in the future.
ipod playlist - Favorite songs from this year
Sotherby’s are auctioning manuscripts by only Arab writer to win Literature Nobel Prize. Cost? A cool £50-70K. http://bit.ly/vPs4uZ
I rarely accept e-books since I do not prefer to read electronically after working at a computer screen all day, I do occasionally review a few e-books myself (it’s rare) but I do have a few reviewers that accept e-books but the turnaround time is rather slow.
Angelo Amaranto, 60, New York, N.Y.
Legislators seized the moment. “There’s no doubt Burnsville provided the jet fuel” for change, Anfinson said.
Still, the crop needs to overcome what Riley refers to as the “snicker factor.”
I was afraid and uncomfortable, but I finally broached the subject with my parents: sober and sane. We didn't say too much but I know that they love me and they don't blame me.
I reminded myself that while I may have hung up the gloves, I'm still very much in the Fight Game -- just in a different capacity. I'm cleaning it. I'm famous now in a different way. Some newspapers call me a crusader.
Y la Virgen concebida
Audrey Hepburn is one of those women...
As usual, it was difficult to choose favorite reads for April. We read quite a few really good books this month and encourage you, if you are a reader, to check out our book blog for our other reviews at Grab a Book From Our Stack.
It is hard to talk about John Zorn’s music since it defies all accepted borders and has encompassed almost every stylistic trend of the last 50 years. He is a musician (saxophonist), record label owner (Tzadik), artistic director (The Stone performing space in N.Y.C.), besides being one of America’s most prolific composers, appearing on over 400 recordings.
Joseph F. Grillo, 46, New York, N.Y.
Gerard read this too:
This world… it can be different.
Notice that my pencil lines are clean and smooth curves. If you find yourself drawing short, jagged lines as you work out a curve then try to break yourself of that habit NOW! Take your rough outline and trace clean smooth lines off it. When I teach comic drawing workshops this is a problem I see over and over again. As soon as students smooth out their lines the picture instantly looks more professional.
Adult Romance: Applying Makeup To Look Great!
day in
"People should be repulsed by what has happened and I would ask them to think about the effect this has had on his partner, and indeed the local community." Mr McKeeney, who was originally from Donegal in the Republic of Ireland, was "extremely popular" and "well known" in the local community and had no known enemies.
We went to Sesame Place in the beginning of September 2008 and in the beginning of June 2009. Both times were a blast - for both the adults and the kids. In 2008, we went with our 3 year old and 1 year old and basically our 3 year old had a blast and our 1 year old didn't have too much to do, but it was still fun for him. This past June, both our 4 year old and 2 year old had a blast. The parade was really fun! They got to high five some of the Sesame Street characters and a 2 year old who was with us got to dance with some of the characters during the parade.
I was my Daddy's first-born little girl, and I was only eight months old when he was called to serve in World War II. He sent gifts--a little Scottish wool tam that I still have, and a china doll for which my mother sewed a bridal dress closely resembling the one she had worn just a few years before (still have the doll and dress, too). Eventually there would be six of us siblings (two girls and four boys), and he loved us all, but for the first three years of my life I was His Little Girl and I knew he loved me best. I think that's a special gift that many first-borns enjoy without ever realizing it.
But shall we not filter the good and maintain some of its glory?
BYS Reign Supreme is a perfect purple creme with an amazing formula, pictured here at 2 coats and with topcoat -- I always wear topcoat so for me this isn't an issue. Reign Supreme dries to an almost matte finish on its own so if you want that high shine with this creme, topcoat is a must.
“I don’t show any mercy, and I am certainly not here to plead for mercy,” he said at the sentencing, a time when most defendants convicted of first-degree murder argue that they should be spared the death penalty.
My message is very simple. Nigerian youths, Nigerian people, I have a two line philosophy. The only thing is laziness, the only religion is work. Very simply put. I think they have their own fans, but you see, maybe we were all created differently, it’s not about me or about them, it’s about everything.
You people are the devil! The amount of times my personal answer to that question has been no and quickly followed by a shattering of confidence as if someone has just pulled the plug from your mind and even the cognitive power to find you way along a simple grid to your seat disappears. Suddenly I do not have enough pens, my socks are itchy and I’m very aware I have neither a protractor nor compass. Despite the knowledge that I am walking into a literature exam I still feel naked without that unsheathed calculator in my pocket and the contents of Staples in a see through pencil case; and god forbid you should have even the tiniest piece of paper in there as you will be sent to the dungeon and tortured next to that guy who’s phone went off last year.
Do you know of any other good contests out there? Sometimes being told what I have to make is good for me - stops me vacillating and makes me focus. Not to mention getting me to try new things.
The fifth member of the commission would then be chosen by the four appointments.
3. Pray for Lakin. God has been growing and maturing his heart in preparation for this adoption by leaps and bounds. Pray that God will continue to develop him into a protective and loving big brother and that God will continue to make room in his heart to share with a little sister.
So now time to turn the shop into yet another theme!
for you have taught me well.
Making a Nearly-Perfect Hard-Boiled Egg
The weekly jobless claims were just released and they total 388,000. Economists were expecting the number to hit 375,000.
Very blessed and proud of my son. So many kids pick on the ones that may not play as well or they sit and talk crap and blame and belittle. I am proud of my son for always encouraging and cheering on his team mates. For sticking up for the ones that the others treat badly and for having a good attitude and sportsmanship. Thankful for the parents that recognize and speak up and have encouraged their kids to do the right thing too. It does my heart good today when one boy tried blaming another for an out to hear my son encourage the boy by telling him the things he did that were right. I am thankful for that quality in my son and pray that it continues to grow. We have some really good kids. I am blessed and thankful!
The ability to change our belief systems isn't a bad thing. Take the above for example .... imagine if, as a society, our beliefs hadn't changed in the last sixty years. To live a life with true health, forward movement, tolerance and with minimal judgement, it's important to challenge our belief systems often.
to me from Brasil.
Garlic infused olive oil
Quit your job
And now time to nominate some amazing bloggers for the Sunshine Award
You'll need carrots, peeled and cut... sugar, butter, salt, low-sodium chicken broth, fresh ground black pepper (optional, I didn't use it) and fresh lemon juice.
Small Elephant needs to get out more often. Or maybe be kept at home behind lock and key…
In the United States it is estimated that 2100 kids go missing EVERYDAY, so you have to be prepared. Most of these cases are quickly solved, so Kids Safety Bands are a great way to communicate. They are also available to display allergies or medical conditions, which can be a lifesaver is many situations! So for just $7.00 I think this product is great for any parent!
We now have a DT of 10 fantastic crafters and we are sponsors by some very big names, all this in a month, we are going to go from strength to strength.
3 state
Yep, but not until until all the people I want to write about have kicked the bucket or they might come after me.
Right now I’m going through a time of pearl gray days scattered with storm-cloud gray moments. Though I’ve done the work of grief in my own way, I have had one great benefit that many people don’t have — that grief support group. Because of their support, because I know someone is paying to attention, I have felt free to embrace my grief fully without worrying that I’m crazy or that I need therapy. Because of them, I know I am coping well, I know my grief is normal, I know I am completely sane. I just haven’t finished with my grieving yet, and it’s possible that I may never be completely finished. And that too is normal.
Please respect Christie's TERMS OF USE: Unless stated otherwise, you may use any of the items or tutorials I post for personal use. If you are wanting to sell items made from my tutorials, please ask me for permission!
Check for understanding. Ask your subordinate to tell a person or show you what you would like them to perform. Appropriate any kind of misunderstandings. Examine once again.
(And if we could work on more essays about history or art or science instead of endless ”personal narratives,” that would be lovely, too. I swear, the New York City public schools are teaching kids to blog! But that’s for another rant.)
L has been loaned this beautiful mare to play this summer and, as expected, has fallen in love! It's such a pleasure to be around horses, and I've been lucky enough to go out for a hack on one of these lovely ponies.
2. Allegations that, in respect of persons resident in Scotland, there are breaches of data protection legislation or other offences in relation to unlawful access to personal data.
But I rode on. It’s funny how easily I can ignore cries of pain from every part of my body except my heart.
The report, 'Ireland’s Gain', links Ireland’s low abortion rate to low incidences of breast cancer and comparative good mental health among women when compared with those in England, Scotland and Wales.
Corner stamp: Magnolia
Of course, any discussion about regulation and insurance must touch on health care reform. The Supreme Court will be considering the law in 2012, with recent reports about the justices meeting “in secret” about the law even before they get the case. Although many arguments have been made about the law, the primary issue is the individual mandate’s constitutionality.
Sounds a bit like self-destructive envy to me, but what do I know, eh?
In Stanford's case, his opposition to independence made his position even worse. Although Trinity College Dublin wanted to give him an honorary doctorate in the early twenties, they were advised that it would be unsafe for him to travel to Ireland.
Today I want to focus on knowledge.
And no, this isn’t some strange side effect of my son growing up. If that was the case my cats would probably be dressed in baby clothes.
NOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO!!!!!!!!
Bullying and cyberbullying are hot topics both in the media and in schools across the country. Many states are enacting stiff laws that address bullying and harassment, and those laws usually include cyberbullying. In some states, cyberbullying can result in jail or prison time, and may be a felony. But, the reality of cyberbullying is that it is not confined to teenagers. Adults are victims of cyberbullying, and more and more adults are becoming cyberbullies. What is the fastest growing population among those who cyberbully? It is adult women.
For the first time this year, we grew berries in our backyard garden. Yum. The best thing about summer is fresh local berries, and you can't get more local than the back yard! Here is a photo of our first few blueberries and strawberries.
Being the big data geek that I am, I've looked at review behavior for many restaurants over a long period of time. One thing that stuck out was that successful restaurant consistently garnered reviews, positive and negative. Not so successful restaurants would stagnate after an initial burst of reviews, garnering maybe one review every month or so. In my interpretation of that behavior, a restaurant with a four-star average with a consistently growing number of reviews is a much better choice than a restaurant with perhaps a 4.5 star average, only a handful of reviews, and the latest review was two months ago. Personally, I would rather eat at a restaurant with a lower average rating that had consistent growth in their reviews rather than a restaurant with a high average rating but no new reviews. That's just my interpretation of the data, and my opinion.
For Mary, the sinlessly born;
We’ve discussed Bevere’s doctrine of tithing and his belief that if you submit to leaders like himself, God will make you rich and receive double portions of God’s Spirit. Read it here:
And yourself?
He may be made-up to resemble some expressionist Apache War Chief, but Orson Welles is in fine sparkly, robust form as Will Varner in 1961's THE LONG, HOT SUMMER (1961) and in fact I love this character even more than his Hank Quinlan. And when one considers with Welles all the great films Welles could have done and didn't due to his heroically self-indulgent arrogance, such as deciding to play the dopey romantic lead instead of the slimy self-loathing lawyer he'd likely written for himself in LADY FROM SHANGHAI, ore realizes great roles like this should be cherished. Director Martin Ritt keeps Orson on a short leash, for his own protection, but he's still allowed to bark.
What happens to us after we die?
Hour by sacred hour
Sebastian: Dude, you get right to the good stuff! I'm a boxer-brief kind of guy.
Requisition Number: PD11-1294706
Mail-order bride Rebecca Ramsey arrives in the New Mexico territory full of dreams—but they're shattered when she discovers her intended husband has been killed. If it weren't for U.S. marshal Seth Billings's housekeeping job offer, she'd have nowhere to go. Rebecca loves tending to Seth's home, but the strong and silent lawman is harder to figure out. What secret is he hiding?
I have a massive objection to it being done on a seriously inclined playing field.
In addition to these place-based investments, the interagency team identified significant opportunities that transcend any given focal area, including more effective coordination with Tribal Nations and more cohesive species monitoring and management. Longer term, the group intends to turn its attention to landscape conservation challenges and opportunities, in particular extending to northern New Mexico and southern Colorado, in order to conserve, restore and protect our nation’s natural and cultural heritage.
However, if you want to terrify parents speak in the broadest term possible: talk about 800,000 missing children per year. That will do it. Many of those are just kids who stayed at the mall too late, a large number are kids that another family took, usually in a custody dispute, some are children that parents literally threw out of their home. Conflate all these categories and you scare the bejesus out of someone. Who wants to do that? Anyone who has an incentive to over-emphasize risks. That would included media that want higher viewer ratings or want to sell newspapers; it would include child protective agencies that rely on tax funding often fueled by fear; it includes child protection charities that know a good scare increases donations, or it may be companies that sell parents fingerprinting, cell phone tracking devices, microchipping, etc.
Australia’s Mandarin-speaking Prime Minister Kevin Rudd said on Thursday he would attend the Beijing Olympics, ignoring human rights activists’ demands that he boycott the event over China’s Tibet crackdown.
That puzzled Wei even more. Unless … unless they were dead.
From selected, stony vineyard sites (pierrets/stones) that suit the minerality of Riesling.
And lo! almost where the ascent began,
Inside was a different matter. There were just the seven guardsmen and the Sherriff, standing quietly by their pillars. At the head of the room, the Stable Rods stood on their bare stone plinth, shimmering even without Clearsight. Good for hundreds of years yet. The Gift-Giver couldn’t have been here about those.
you’re just like, deliberately confounding
but don't expect to stick with the same crowd throughout the year - your friends will constantly change and you can pick who you want!
Contemporary theology in the secular universities reflects the dominant world-view of humanist subjectivism, where every person’s god is as good as the other and every person’s truth is as valid as the other. Ironically, that very threat to Bible absolutes has driven some evangelicals to co-operate with any who stand for an objective Christian theology and has led them into a new rapprochement with Roman Catholics in the United States. The RC Church is, however, far from the monolithic body it once was and some of its academics, like Paul Knitter, are as close to universalism as the Hindus. Herbert Pollitt has amply documented the influence of this New Age thinking on the church (The Inter- Faith Movement, Banner of Truth, 1996). If the spirit of the age remains as strong an influence on the church as it has previously been then we can expect to hear a lot more of Creation Theology, well beyond sandal-wearing seminars at the Greenbelt Festival.
P.S. Save that bottom part of the solar light. No telling what we can use this for but I'm sure we'll come up with something clever.
MOST CONTROVERSIAL: I'm about as non-confrontational as they come. But I do have opinions about controversial specific topics and I don't mind sharing them. I'd like to think I usually do so in a rational manner rather than in a trollish tone. Whatever the reason, I can't say as I've ever had any real "controversy" about a post. Maybe it's just because my readers are all so nice? ;) Still, if there were any controversy to be found, I suspect it would be either in my annual Xmas Rant or one of my numerous posts in support of Same Sex Marriage.
In closing, today was a great day, and we are reminded once again just how blessed we truly are. Now, though, I need your help. We need a name for this new little jenny. We prefer our names to have meaning, and some sort of Biblical meaning or something giving praise and thanks to God is even better. “Shiloh,” for example, is of Hebrew origin and means “His gift”–appropriate because she was given to us in a time of need. So, let me know your thoughts for this new cutie. The winner will receive…..ummmm…..a really big “Thank YOU!” and the joy of seeing your chosen name printed on my blog! How’s that for a mega-prize?!
10 Why Do Fools Fall in Love
A while back, when Fox was still in the business of issuing DVDs, it was rumoured that Inferno was due a release in the US, possibly as part of the noir line but nothing ever came of it. However, it has been given a release in R2 in Spain by a company called Impulso. They have licensed a number of titles and market them as Fox Cinema Classics. The transfer for Inferno is a generally pleasing one. Viewed on a 37 inch screen I thought it looked fine for the most part – the image is mostly smooth and sharp but there are instances of heavy grain (especially during the titles). The colour is quite strong but it can take on a slight pinkish hue at times. The disc itself is pretty basic with the only extra of note being a gallery. All told, I was satisfied with this one and it is the only way to get your hands on this title at the time of writing. Inferno is a tight, pacy little movie that clocks in at 80 minutes and rarely stops to take a breath. I’d rate it highly as a noirish thriller in an unusual setting, boasting classy performances and excellent visuals.
Just put a handful of wheat in there and grind it until it looks roughly like this:
"Grandmother?"
I just had to show off one of the shoppes I was visiting this fine Fall Day
As pre-construction demolition proceeds and the project moves toward a new phase, Stuckey's departure may be politically advantageous for the developer. Just as the new administration of the Empire State Development Corporation can disavow some of its predecessor's decisions, a new Forest City point person might distance herself from--if not exactly disavow--some of Stuckey's statements.
1 c. Ritz cracker crumbs
calm.
Give it a listen and let me know what you think.
But at the same time I’ve known that it would be better to stay calm than to get carried away the way I have.
Junkies in the alley with a baseball bat
they're all at home living it up on the internet
The British media has been quick to exploit his mystique through stories that played on his eccentric reputation. But they have been faster to switch tact, this time condemning a man harder than the studs that raked down Song’s shin. Listening to the drivel Jamie Redknapp spouts into the Sky Sports cameras is always an eye-gougingly painful experience but as he sat there laying into Balotelli he marked the moment in which the striker became the City scapegoat. As his never-ending stream of venom was fired at the Italian throughout the coverage, it became painfully apparent of just how tough a ride Balotelli is given. Would it be the same if Jack Wilshere had the same attitude? Probably not.
And the words, final as lead weights, fall from his lips,
encased in dresses that
I wondered if he ever got tired of repeating the same daily pep talk to every audience. Charming and engaging, he could have had his own talk show -- and maybe he will some day. We practiced cheering, then cheering wildly, then applauding, then stopping applauding, on cue.
2 well-formed
Emma Sullivan (@emmakate988), 18, who lives in a suburb of Kansas City, Kansas, visited Topeka on a school trip. While there she tweeted, "Just made mean comments at gov. brownback and told him he sucked, in person #heblowsalot."
-New York Literary Agency
If we have all the knowledge in the world without knowing how to make it applicable, we are missing half of the equation. Even worse, the other half may become useless, confusing and even chaotic.
(not your anger)
Is our client the institution(s) and professionals with whom we engage, such as, government ministries, bar associations, judges, advocates or prosecutors?
We drove through the neighborhood where she and her husband had lived when they were newlyweds She had me pull up in front of a furniture warehouse that had once been a ballroom where she had gone dancing as a girl.
She picks up her pen to finish her homework. After a few moments she looks up at me.
Y- Yvonne
This year the Nine night festival is reduced to 8 nights and Ninth day is Vijaya dasami.
This was so simple even I could manage it.
Olivia has spent the last ten years fundraising and building the Olivia Newton-John Cancer and Wellness Centre in her hometown of Melbourne, Australia (www.OliviaAppeal.com) which will open its doors this June. She’s always been an ardent environmentalist and continues to support many a good cause. Currently she and her second husband ‘Amazon’ John Easterling are on the board of the Amazon Center for Environmental Education and Research (ACEER.org), which champions the rights of indigenous communities. For Olivia, the appeal of celebrity seems to lie particularly in leveraging it in the support of others.
Right now I'm halfway through the third book, The Magdalen Martyrs. Story is good, pop culture references abound, Jack can't seem to keep it all together. I'm at turns annoyed and intrigued. Maybe this is the sign of a good book, or a flawed one with glimmers of brilliance. I haven't decided. I can't believe I'm saying this, but I think I would enjoy these stories more as a movie or television series. The character and setting would stay intact without the intrusion of the devices used by the author.
3 footsteps
As a huge fan of ZZ Top Prefab Sprout and someone who likes to think they’ve got their pinky planted firmly on the pulse of today’s pop music, I was both ecstatic to learn that a new album is due out very shortly and annoyed that, according to prefabsprout.net, I have “been living under a rock all year” since I’m only hearing about it now. In my defense, no one really talks about Prefab Sprout anymore. Of course, there was a time when they ruled, or at least visited, the indie airwaves (a little known pop trivia fact: in 1993, I named my outdoor volleyball team the Prefab Sprouts. Opponents thought we were a bunch of new-age granolas. No one else cared.).
PLACE: Front yard
pronghorn antelope! one day in the far, far distance we spotted them. a herd of eight was moving from the south to the north across the plains. oh how we wanted to drive closer to see them, but just like in the serengeti, you must stay on the road (even if it is a narrow dirt one). so we turned around and headed north too, maybe a mile ahead of the antelopes, until we found a road that led out into what we hoped would be closer to their path in passing...
Gavin Humphries, one of the co-authors of the study conducted by education consultants MTM Consulting, believed this practice was not sustainable.
Well yesterday, I did some couponing. I had to get ready for the Community Yard sale that my daddy’s housing edition had. I was kinda rushed because I only had one day to complete the shopping that I needed, but I got enough done. I need to transport everything back from my dad’s to my house, and restock it. But will get the pictures up soon as I get everything right.
when a friend
And so yes, OOO is about flat ontology. And let’s face it, flat ontology and immanence are all the rage. But who cares? Or rather, why is that the rage? The point I was making in the segment that Levi quoted is that the original desire for ‘flatness’ in ontology comes from, genealogically speaking, Nietzsche’s call for a ‘this worldly’ philosophy, and finds more distant precursors in Spinoza and the Roman Stoics. Deleuze then shows how this essentially ethical project can be tied to ontology in a wide variety of ways. But even for Deleuze, I think the impetus is primarily ethical. While Deleuze does ontology, he is not fundamentally an ontologist. For him, it seems to me, at least, ethics comes before ontology. Deleuze largely suspends questions of knowledge and justification of his thought, he simply presents it, like an old-fashioned metaphysician such as Leibniz or Spinoza. Of course, he does so in a way that gets beyond the deconstructionist style critiques in that he also has a fully fashioned philosophy of language which takes into account the ‘linguistic turn,’ and his metaphysics of the virtual is able to skate around many of the critiques of presence articulate by Derrida and the like. And his work continually ‘self-deconstructs’ the binaries he uses. So, while he’s no ‘old fashioned metaphysician’, he’s certainly a metaphysician.
The costs of the National government’s profligacy are going to be borne by people my age. But there is a major issue here – people my age are in no way going to be earning the sorts of incomes that can handle the enormous tax increases necessary.
- AR4 is shorthand for the U.N.’s Intergovernmental Panel of Climate Change’s (IPCC) Fourth Assessment Report, presented in 2007 as the consensus view on how bad man-made climate change has supposedly become.
I am also proud of myself because I haven’t called him or texted him. I don’t care where he went (okay, I do care a little bit). But I’m not going to stress about it. Him leaving hurt, but it should have expected it because that’s always how he reacts when the truth is too hard to handle. I guess him leaving is better than having him stay and continue yelling at me. And at least it’s a Saturday so I can stay up writing, processing, and dealing with my emotions on my own. Because with or without him I will get past this.
This email makes me angry, sad, and irritated. Irritated that the author didn’t bother to do any research at all. In a simple Google search of New York Literary Agency the first three hits were writers' message board warnings about the agency, the third was the agency’s horrible Web site, and the fourth was Preditors and Editors saying, “New York Literary Agency, The: Strongly not recommended.” I’m also angry and sad that there are people out there taking advantage of writers who are just desperate to find a home for their works.
Connected by more than a dozen bridges over river Jehlum flowing across the city, a major portion of the old city is named after these bridges such as Amira Kadal, Budshah Kadal, Habba Kadal, Fateh Kadal, Zaina Kadal, Nawa Kadal, Aali Kadal and Safa Kadal and more. Zaina Hal, the first wooden bridge, was
And I did it again, I dozed (not fell asleep) and jerked awake, I can’t do this anymore, I’m not writing in a straight line anymore. Good night and good luck, so much luck, you can have what I didn’t take so a lot of luck and a little tired, only a little of that because I used up most of it. I will go now, but I don’t know if it’s to the class where I am sitting or to sleep where I am existing.
Who was that man who said something about not paying attention to the speck in the other person’s eye, but get rid of the log in your own eye? He was onto something.
Alvy, what is so fascinating about a group
While some online commenters have lauded him for fighting the good fight against a government and developer with enormous resources, some sneer that he was in it for the money. That's hard to believe, given the amount of work he put in.
7. Pour half the batter into the prepared tube pan and spread evenly around. Sprinkle half the crumb topping onto the batter, then top with the remaining batter. Carefully spread the batter around to cover the crumb topping, then sprinkle the top with the remaining crumbs.
John cried and John took Sam into the bathroom to die with Sam.
Looking out my living room window this morning, I watch with awe at the powerful thunderstorm raging all around our home. Although it is now several hours after sunrise, darkness quickly envelopes the land as the ominous storm clouds race to block out any rays of light. As the sky lets loose all at once with a violent downpour, the room echoes with the pounding of the rain on the roof and I find it hard to see through the quickly clouding window and the steady stream of water falling to the earth. The river is now raging as strong winds whip up and cause whitecap waves to crash about while the water is simultaneously pummeled by the large, powerful raindrops exploding on its surface. A bright white flash fills the dark sky as lightning crackles through the heavens, and almost immediately, the booming clap of accompanying thunder rattles our home. The lightning is so close that the thunder clap starts with the unmistakeable snap like the crack of a whip and then explodes with the earth-shaking boom letting me know that I am in the heart of the storm.
Michael stirred in his seat from across the huge mahogany desk, his head held slightly down and his eyes shifting nervously around, scanning, one by one, the leather bound volumes of ancient texts that packed the walnut bookcases behind Zero, then up to the bas-relief images of antiquity that crowned them. Then twitching back and forth between the two Tiffany glass lamps that stood guard on each end of the mahogany expanse between them. Then darting from object to object that littered it. Pen. Paper. Ink pad. Pencil. A worn dictionary. Then back to the pen. His eyes racing for a place to rest; someplace, anyplace, that was not Abdel ‘Zero’ Gadi.
Tuesday – A woman discovered that her husband cheated on her when she was nine months pregnant. After he spent a week on the couch, her life ostensibly returned to normal, but she cannot bring herself to be intimate with him. She recently discovered that he had spent money at a fancy bath and body store, but nothing he bought was for her.
Here is another photo of quilters hard at work. The margarita glasses were unfortunately used for Diet Coke!
The Hon. Michael Kirby, AC, CMG has had a remarkable national and international career as a distinguished jurist. He came out in Who’s Who in Australia in 1999, naming Johan van Vloten as his long-term partner. While President of the International Commission of Jurists he encouraged that organisation to give more consideration to human sexuality as an aspect of human rights and, as an Anglican, he has expressed disappointment at his church’s stance on gay rights.
outside my own little world
So I just did me some talkin' to the sun
One of the problems however, is that the pastels will get all over your piece, not just on the medium. No FEAR! There is an easy fix. Let it dry completely, then lightly spritz it with water. Place it face down on a paper-towel. Don't move it around just lift it off. If there's still pastels in places you don't want, repeat. It gets the other areas nice and clean!
By the year 1984-85, these fall downs had become an embarrassment to the whole movement. There was questioning and rebellion from the rank and file devotees against the then leadership by a 50-man committee, seeking reforms. Ironically many members of the 50-man committee were philosophically bribed into becoming gurus themselves, that year. They, disregarded and ignored the clear direction/order on initiation given by Srila Prabhupada in black and white- explaining it off as ‘non- traditional’ and calling it a ‘lone document’. However the glaring fact is that the direction was addressed to the entire GBC and all Temple Presidents. As if the spiritual master has to repeat himself over and over in order to convey himself.
1. Mix all filling ingredients in a bowl, stir-well and set aside.
The bible never commands us to give thanks for everything but rather to give thanks in everything “in everything give thanks; for this is the will of God in Christ Jesus for you”. (1 Thess 5: 18). There is a big difference between the two, and it is pretty difficult to be thankful for many things. For example, if someone gets into a car accident do you give thanks for the car accident? Do you say “thank you God for smashing my car”. No. But do you give thanks in the car accident? Yes. Why?
Your journal should contain your true self rather than a picture of you when you are “made up” for a public performance. There is a temptation to paint one’s virtues in rich color and whitewash the vices, but there is also the opposite pitfall of accentuating the negative. Personally I have little respect for anyone who delves into the ugly phases of the life he is portraying, whether it be his own or another’s. The truth should be told, but we should not emphasize the negative. Even a long life full of inspiring experiences can be brought to the dust by one ugly story. Why dwell on that one ugly truth about someone whose life has been largely circumspect?
Tryndamere: That costs money.
Even to this day, I know, without a doubt that I could walk up the path to any of the homes of my aunts and uncles or of my cousins who are now adults, and knock on the door and be accepted. I would be invited in to 'rest a spell' and visit. After the rounds of hugs from young and old alike, the inevitable question would be asked, " Have you eat yet?"
We hope you can join us on Saturday night for music by The Story Of and The Ugly Beats, co-operation, and of course great beer! Our November Beer Social will return to The Compound (1300 E 4th St) this Saturday, November 17th from 7-10 PM.
A passage led off and wound its way into the dark and from there came the faint sound of running water; rather than pause to collect the rest of the party, the daring duo pressed on to see where the passage led.
Strength: The awesome backcourt of Tu Holloway and Mark Lyons is capable of taking the Musketeers on run. They are great off the dribble and are capable of knocking down threes from behind the three-point line. It’s hard to defend those two because of their quickness and how fearless they are. If they play to their ability, these two can give Xavier fans a good feeling about this season.
Rules: Both runs must be completed as a team. The Muscle-Ups may not be started until the 4 team members all complete the run, also time does not stop until all team members complete the run. The Muscle-Ups may be apportioned in any manner, but ALL TEAM MEMBERS MUST DO AT LEAST 10 reps, with the limit for one member being 30 reps. I.e. 3 team members could do 10 reps, and one member could do 30, all 3 members could do 15, or any other combination as long as all members perform 10 reps. Teams may only use ONE SET of rings. Rings may be hung at any height as long as full extension AND turnout is achieved at the bottom. Teammates may help each other reach the rings.
Vitamin H – See Biotin.
listen in kindness to our prayers
“What? Where is Ophelia’s house? Where is Ophelia?” I asked.
Adrienne had about 10 under her house. But hey, baby steps to preparedness, right?!?
Then came the Border Wars and the Communist onslaught, wave after wave… until the sudden illusory announcement that it no longer exists. Yet, the evidence is clear for all to see that we’re still being haunted by that same ol’ spirit – the same one that murdered the Biblical Abel… “He was a murderer from the beginning, and abode not in the truth, because there is no truth in him…” (John 8:44 KJV)
DJ Sumbody: Yes the video will be shot at the Lecoq warehouses soon enough.
We start our run tonight, 31st May, from 9 till 10pm. We'd be delighted if you'd pop by for a listen. Just go to http://www.s6radio.co.uk/ and click on the player. We also have a page on their 'presenters' section, if you fancy a peep.
It's been almost a month since my last post. And I've been wondering if it's time to let go of blogging. I started as a way of practising writing, almost five years ago, and I do that by just writing now. I teach writing, and I write. So I don't feel the same compulsion to write a blog anymore.
He said occasionally archaeologists will go through the rubble and pull up carved relics.
COVER top with your preferred sauce and toppings
Lessig, L. (2004). Free culture: The nature and future of creativity. New York, NY: Penguin Press.
Go and open the door
He was also asked about his dealings with Ms Anne Colvin, in connection with the alleged “Moat House” incident. Indeed, in connection with that Mr Wight accepted that he had given incorrect evidence in the earlier case regarding payments by the NotW to Ms Colvin and her friend. Bearing in mind that he admitted this mistake at the trial in November 2010, I suggest it is unlikely that that now forms the basis for a perjury investigation against him.
Do the countless and faceless rescuers from 9/11 have the same value as the 2974 victims? We don't hear of them and their suffering from subsequent illnesses and deaths related to being in the smoke and concrete dust. The city of New York do not pay any compensation or medical bills for these men and women. Will they have a memorial or a state service?
FINISHING: Attach snowflakes with thread or fine gold cord around crocheted ring, hanging them at different lengths. Make bows from gold cord and attach with glue or pins to edge of crocheted ring, spacing them evenly around.
And it was a $113 copay too. (And $35 for the drugs.)
Sloppy Firsts by Megan McCafferty (this was originally published for adults but often collected for Teens).
Kerrisdale and westward.....Creme Brule perhaps, after all one lady stated on the news a few years ago when protesting rapid transit being put in her neighbourhood that how dare the city do that! They are the creme de la creme of Vancouver after all!(Well gosh lady, maybe it might help your cleaning lady get to your house in 30 minutes instead of 2 hours)
3. 'Slipping' specifically, as demonstrated by the fact that I posted it. It's a great song. Very dramatic. Lots of sudden starts and stops.
A horribly biased media that will not even investigate Operation Fast And Furious will certainly not investigate this grossly transparent act of political prostitution by "journalist" George Stephanopoulos. In graphic terms, this was not merely discreet political sex for a quiet off-camera payoff; this was naked, loud copulation at high noon, on the public square. Even so, today almost nobody will say aloud what needs to be said: George Stephanopoulos has now proven himself a political whore of the lowest stripe, but even worse than that, he has shown himself to be a serving member in good standing of Gangster Government, Inc.
Manchester City saw off a dark horse Norwich City at Carrow Road in some style, running out 6-1 winners including a hat-trick for Carlos Tevez and double for Sergio Aguero as they piled the pressure on Manchester United for the title race.
How about Janine's sketch? Wasn't it great?!
If you want tears, I´m your girl!
Trousers - what do you mean they don’t have trousers in America? What do they call them? I don’t know… like jeans but not made of denim. Oh hang on! PANTS! Snigger, snigger.
The two thoughts that stuck with me today...
17 times more likely!!
First of all, you'll need to be dreadfully honest with yourself. We all have these lovely, idealised ideas about ourselves which we value and promote, which are all too often based on a skewed sense of who we are. We amplify the positive bits and trumpet these as loudly as we can to all and sundry, we ignore the negative ones as much as possible, preferring they weren't there at all. We decide that practical personal limits aren't necessary for us and end up doing all kinds of dumb things, up to, including and even beyond self-destructive behaviours. Put them all aside, and dare yourself to see who you really are.
"What's that for?"
1979 – Kramer vs. Kramer
Since the azaleas stopped blooming weeks ago, they're here primarily to provide structure to help hold other stems in place. Hydrangeas also work well for this purpose. This approach makes it possible to avoid having to use oasis (wet floral foam) to hold flowers where you want them. Some florists say cut flowers last longer in water minus the foam. It's certainly easier to tell when additional water (or changing the water completely) is needed.
Dorie has so many great recipes up her sleeves. I wish this big glossy page of the cookbook had one of those printed on it, instead. Anyone want my leftovers?
October 8 – Nassau Veterans Memorial Coliseum, Uniondale, Long Island, NY
The word vEda is pronounced as bhEd bengal, nepal, NE India and perhaps elsewhere too.
It's hermeneutics—as if the spatial expansion of whole neighborhoods is really just a graph of certain words used in different contexts. As if vocabulary itself materializes, precipitating out as alternative spatial futures for the city. Indeed, the New York Times writes, "in Scarano’s view, the city’s code was a Talmudic document, open to endless avenues of interpretation. Through a variety of arcane strategies, he could literally pull additional real estate out of the air."
Let me be the change I want to be. Even if I am not the light, I can be the spark.
The above is what I read on the net more then a year ago..
So why are the readings a particular problem so far as the lay engagement is concerned?
My grandfather was in loud love. He said it a lot, every day, every opportunity. He loved my grandmother, my father, my brother, this city. He thought anyone who lived in San Francisco and had never walked across the Golden Gate Bridge was nuts. He laughed and he argued and he was always stopping at a mailbox.
That I've never felt before
It is not capitalism to finance businesses that have run themselves into the ground with shoddy practices. It is not capitalism to give a hand-out to companies that don't conduct their business profitably. It is capitalism to allow them to fail.
Artists featured: Jyll Bradley, Paulo Catrica, Filipa César, Marcus Coates, Dorothy Cross (with actor Fiona Shaw), Alexis Deacon, Jeremy Deller, Tania Kovats, Kaffe Matthews, Semiconductor (Ruth Jarman and Joe Gerhardt) and Alison Turnbull.
Jenny and Andy at the funny, smart and genuinely useful blog, Dinner: A Love Story approach this with the kind of attitude I think we could all aspire to. They’re like the friend you know to call when you’re feeling low, because they’re steady and sure in their views, but also comforting. They’re big proponents of home-cooking and eating together as a family but, in a recent post, Jenny, whose book about family dinner is coming out soon, wrote about her various strategies for taking the pressure off. Number 3 was “Give yourself at least one From-the-Freezer night.” By that she means, either something you’ve prepared and frozen or something you’ve bought that can be reheated. Strategy Number 5 is “Go out on Thursday or Friday night.”
Dans le bouge des argousins.
Anyways... I've decided to make my own desert island selections. I practically live on one already.
Jacob Russell, Facilitator
i've definitely slacked on my fitness over the last 2 years - but once i get myself back in motion - i need to run a marathon, doesn't have to be a full one, just some sort of one, to know i've done it!
Market Research Reports Distributor – Aarkstore.com have vast database on market research reports, company financials, company profiles, SWOT analysis, company report, company statistics, strategy review, industry report, industry research to provide excellent and innovative service to our report buyers.
Ritenour walks the reader through several different things that can cause a change in demand or supply. For demand, changes in buyers’ income and tastes are important factors. A change in an area’s population inevitably affects demand there. An expectation of a change in future prices may affect people’s decision to buy or not buy in the present. Finally, changes in the markets for related goods can affect a good’s demand. On the supply side, investment in production, a change in the prices of factors of production, improving technology, an increase in the number of sellers, and a change in the market for complementary goods can all have an impact.
Rest 1 minute
- All the Chapter question assignments are due the first day of the week.
My base is made of teal bazzill, white, chocolate chip and some MME Hattie DP. Across this I've added more teal (punched with the MS Loop punch), chocolate chip and more Hattie DP. Over this panel I've added some white crochet lace and some white satin ribbon that has been coloured with a BG13 Copic Marker. I've stamped the border and centre from Strength and Courage twice, cut the centre out with scissors from one and popped it up over the second that I've coloured with a BG13 Copic and cut out with Large Oval Nestabilities. This has been framed with more teal bazzill cut with Large Scallop Oval Nestabilities and then matted again with white cut with Labels 20 Nestabilities. Next I've attached a bow (coloured with BG13), some silver cord and silver charm and topped with a white button, airbrushed with BG13. Finally I finished with a few white pearls in the top corners.
There is nothing more chaotic and exhausting then renovating one home while packing up and preparing to move the other with a teething 9 month old in tow. No wait; renovating, packing, teething 9 month old and condo neighbors starting extensive and noisy all day renovations. Naptimes can already be a struggle, so adding noisy banging is the kiss of death. Goodbye calm days, goodbye mommy-time. If that wasn’t enough, schedule and routine; the foundations of a happy baby (and happy mommy) have been thrown out the window as I am now prepared to drop everything at a moment’s notice to run to meet with tradespeople for estimates or to pay for work completed if my husband can’t make it. As Dr Phil would say, “This ain’t my first rodeo” – we have bought, gutted and totally renovated a property before –but never before with child. And yes, I am aware I just quoted Dr Phil.
That's my crackly "Indiana Jones" leather skirt (no link as it has no label), and sadly, this will be the last wear of the pumpkin tights as they blew a hole today.
Apparently, Hailey was cold and wet. The barn we ordered hasn't gotten here yet. So Tatum took pity on her and gave her a jacket. That poor sweet child... She has such a big heart. I just love her so much.
An ok collection.
Home made baked egg custard with nutmeg topping. Shhhh, the cook had a little taste. Both Hanno and I agree it's drop dead delicious. A triple D rating.
Midnight sent the last of the emails hurtling into the ether and then it was time.
-DWP letter about reassessment from Incapacity Benefit to ESA arrives.
You’re a dance in Bali.
5. A baby grand piano
Labour hung around for another fruitless hour or so looking for “weapons of mass destruction” before finally giving up and leaving looking very very dejected.
Wind farms, who does not hate the sight of wind-farms? I certainly do. You may think they are necessary as a source of clean and renewable power. If you do I urge you to think again, think of the implications of these hideous blots on the landscape for the landscape. As foreign investors rush in to capitalise on British wind - and the wind of British politicians - just remember that it would take require a farm the size of Greater London to generate as much energy as a single coal-fired power station, assuming a never ending windy day.
なしくずしオペラ
As most of you know, I've been putting a disproportionate amount of time into the anti-bridge-tolls insurgency, and today is the final "public input" meeting with the group that we've come to address (not lovingly) as the Tolling Authority. It's from 4:00 - 7:00 p.m. this afternoon, in downtown Louisville at the Muhammad Ali Center.
So the wise air and DNA entanglement create scenarios to bring change for the acceleration of growth at hand. Should we move thru the change with love and focus in our heart (not saying it is easy, we just move thru it whether we like it or not) the next field of our life is even more intense, great even.
We understand God guaranteed not a good life, but a perfect eternity. The dying child, the loved spouse with cancer, are dilemmas for the atheist, not for someone who knows there is an immortal soul, and the end is our beginning.
Apparently I’m not the only one who has concerns. If you haunt the Arts advocacy blog world for long you quickly see the uneasiness that underlies the “Rah! Rah!” boosterism. The positive spin sometimes doled out often serves only as a thin veneer that papers over some very real worries about the Arts industry.
The template should be pretty user friendly! There are a series of pre-filled maintenance items that can just be checked as completed on the vehicle, and a space to add additional comments if necessary!
A dark and riveting race against the clock, Prime Suspect is an unforgettable introduction to this bestselling series from Edgar Award-winning author Lynda La Plante.
As a woman in the South after the Civil War, Scarlett O’Hara is often in danger, too. Her vulnerability makes our bad feelings for her soften at times (though she keeps making us angry throughout the entire novel!)
Strengthening my resolve, and hardening my heart a little bit more…I reminded myself that this was just two friends…having dinner. Nothing more. Nothing less. Just…dinner.
consider one or two small starts to stitch on
(tumultuous now the contest rages,)
You wouldn't know the trouble we've had trying to find some cabbage plants this late in the season. We wanted to get something in the ground at the garden share plot. We've tried numerous local garden centres and all of them proved fruitless. It seems that garden centres think the vegetable growing season ends when the final strawberries ripen. All those grow your own banners have been taken down, the vegetable plants have gone.
I also appreciate that though identified as a girl by the authors, there's nothing in either the Wild Child's dress or behaviour that conforms to any gender expectations. She's just a kid who likes doing things her own way!
I loved that the narrator was imperfect and unreliable, because in real life, who isn't? I loved the dimensions of all the characters, and the ending I did not expect, and the complexity of emotions. I didn't like Tony, but I didn't really like anyone in The Sense of an Ending. That did not prevent me from loving it.
If you are practicing and you are still having trouble go for the colours that both end in 0 (BV00, B00, RV10, BG10 etc). Once you've mastered the paler colours you can move on to the darker shades.
Caroline lived and slept with my mum. She drank but never to the extent that mum did. In fact, I can not ever recall seeing Caroline obviously under the influence. As with all my mother's lovers (male or female) it wasn't long before violent arguments started bashing their way against the wall. The next thing we knew Caroline had moved into our room. She said mum “needed mental help”, that she “was fuckin' crazy.” And she was absolutely right.
Todays Question: "Do you ever start out thinking...this is it and end up thinking...this is so not it?"
Oh, I crack myself up, making up my own blog carnivals for the 20 people out there who occasionally look at my blog :) And on top of it, I'm sure someone else has already come up with Tasty Tuesday ...
1 small tomato, thinly sliced
10. Blue Moon of Kentucky
we think the transformation is wonderful.
God will help you deal with whatever
All the tax rates and exemptions refer to national inheritance law, and apply to almost all non-residents. Residents will find regional differences.
Song of the Day: Bright Eyes- Four Winds
I have been in serious need of new shoes, a fact that Ian finds very hard to believe, but a real need nonetheless. Particularly work shoes. See, I have been wearing the same sensible black heels that I bought for my summer internship three years ago, complete with a chunky heel and ankle strap. Not really cute at all. At one point, I invested in some better, more modern black heels from Kohls, but one was lost at some point in my bachelorette party travels, and one somehow made it down to Virginia. So that does a lot of good.
I saw the best minds of my generation, but I sure
Robert van Tonder left the National Party in 1961 in order to advocate for the restoration of the Boer Republics.
First let’s look at Wikipedia:
The Director of Design for Bruschwig & Fils, David Toback, told me yesterday that they are making three new color ways of Le Lac for Fall 2012. THEY ARE MAKING THREE NEW COLOR WAYS OF LE LAC for Fall 2012. I think Le Lac is pretty perfect just as she is, but I can't wait to see her cousins.
I want to sleep for days and days.
I enjoy reading all your sweet comments. I try my very
"Our goal was to embrace the spirit of what Mel and Buck created and bring it to a new generation. The movie pays homage to the touchstones of the series; its irreverence, political satire and some of the catchphrases that are now part of our culture," says Segal, "but with a fresh story, a 2008 point of view and a style and energy all its own. The idea was to make a movie that offers as much to new viewers as longtime fans and, bottom line, to just make it funny as hell so it doesn't matter if you know the history or not."
I have been using only one perfume for years now. I got a bottle of Coco Mademoiselle for Christmas 2008 and the thing is, perfumes give me a headache. So I only use this specific perfume that I'm used to and don't recognize any longer. I'm not even sure why my boyfriend at the time thought it was a good idea to give a bottle o__ô
Stay tuned... :)
I'm thinking BBQ has stolen the show as far as American food is concerned.
As I said, what caught my eye in my research was a reference to Burden’s focus and concern with respect to the issue of superblocking in Battery Park City. Battery Park City’s design is such an excellent exemplar of the opposite that you would think the issue would never come up. What’s more the concern was expressed by Burden in connection with respect to Battery Park City’s Teardrop Park which, having visited it, I never would have suspected would raise superblocking concerns. Yet here in a July/August 2004 Downtown Express story (A look back as Battery Park City nears next phase, By Josh Rogers) I read:
Make the proposal a way to cheer her up: Wait until the perfect opportunity, such as at a relative’s funeral.
my husband helped me (who am I kidding..he did all the
I don’t have a tape player anymore, but it’s like vinyl, you see? Collector item that deteriorates very fast… A fetish, again.
Picking the options for the dynamic text field.
Friday, March 28:
Be prepared for ear-splitting screechy guitar sound, often-impossible-to-follow drumming, mostly improvised, nervy vocals by Markús and an improbable mix of truly experimental music that's also fun to dance to!
The students may be young, but they see the harm that smoking is doing to their community. They “think Linton should be a non-smoking town,” and that “there are too many people that smoke in this town.” The third-graders believe that smoking “is not good for the community.” One student asks a valid question: ”How can people stand to smoke?”
Followers will know that a while back now I started the task of making a Star Wars Death Star for my boys. Here's where we got up to on Friday afternoon:
In addition to short, informative essays on topics such as “Slavery in Brooklyn,” “Marriage and Family,” “The Church” and “Farming Brooklyn,” the digital exhibit includes an image gallery of 77 different documents and pictures that have been scanned from the collection for our viewing enjoyment.
Without the arrival of mail to break up the empty purposeless day into two smaller, more manageable periods of emptiness, Saturday will become, like Sunday, another "lost day," when nothing is accomplished and life ceases to have meaning.
Every business owner has been there…buried in deadlines, trying their best to squeeze 30 hours into 24 each day. When things are crazy it’s really tough to take a step back and find time do something that doesn’t mean immediate profit. But just because an act lacks immediate money in your pocket, does not mean that it’s not worthy of your time. A simple act of helping someone out just to help them out can go a long way toward building goodwill in the community and a solid reputation for your company. So how do you get started? I’m glad you asked!
2. Standing, you will start the prayer raising both hands up close to your ears and say “Allahu Akbar” (God is Most Great).
This wasn't about the validity of a war effort.
Into a daybreak that's wondrously clear
On 14 February 2011, Dan O'Leary (Sean's father) filed an application with the US Patent and Trademark Office for the trade mark 'One Direction' in Class 41 for 'entertainment, namely, live performances by a musical band' (No 85241506). The dates of first use and of first use in commerce were given as being 2 October 2010. The trade mark was accepted and published for opposition on 29 November 2011. It was duly opposed and those proceedings are ongoing.
- If you link your creation to any online gallery, please use the keyword 2TC3
Beer: Adnams ‘Tally Ho’ Bottle 7.0%
Auma Obama has always been an activist for social justice and especially towards a balanced depiction of Africa in the northern hemisphere.
her. If you can be sure UJ gets a copy, he’ll be sure to print a copy
I don't want to get all sappy, but it's pretty amazing how much things can change. It's crazy how much life can surprise you. Sometimes you end up facing challenges you never thought you could handle. Sometimes you end up doing things you never thought you would. Sometimes you find that more people are rooting for you than you thought. Sometimes the supporters you thought would always be there, just aren't anymore. And sometimes you find yourself about to sign up for the craziest racing experience you never thought you'd attempt! Ha ha. Well, crazy for me anyways...
Maybe it would be easier to see the food as a kind of fuel for my body, which allows me to live longer and stay healthy, so to live better. If I think about it in this way, I don’t mind not to drink or eat in the evenings, I just don’t have an answer right now, what I will do with the free hours, I have…
The journalists thus miss the point. The crucial part of the story is not that the dangers were ignored, but why they were ignored, and long after they were known - and why the replacement was so long in coming. Here, it is not good enough simply to say that the MoD failed. There was a very specific and egregious failure, attributable not to officials but to senior officers in the Army. They not only ignored the shortcomings of the Snatch, but actively blocked replacement with better vehicles.
With unnatural energy.
An even stronger candidate than Suozzi would be one with a statewide profile and, other than Paterson, that means Attorney General Andrew Cuomo. I don't know anything about his views on Atlantic Yards and development issues.
We have recently celebrated “world Arthritis Day” in big way.
We're so excited to be doing this hop and we have a fabulous lineup with some very talented ladies. There will be lots of fun projects, along with some great blog candy, and a great grand prize for this hop. Check out each blog and see what blog candy you can win at the individual
I dived into a pint of Magic Rock Dark Arts. Another 6% job, big toffee coloured head, big clash of roasty chocolate and hops in the mouth. I was getting very mellow and contemplating just stopping, but got off my backside and headed back down the hill to the station. I liked this place a lot - friendly, lots of good local beer and a simple proposition I can get my head around - Ale, Cider and Meat.
Most of y'all probably know now, I'm talking about Meg, that little hottie living "across the pond." She recently opened up a jewelry shop and the pieces could not be more stunning.
“Hope costs nothing; it is free. Yet at the same time, it is life’s most valuable treasure.
s - 2 * 180°/s = the degrees of the angles of regular polygons, where s = the number of sides of the polygon.
Oh, well, I suppose the show will go on without me.
Mix-match. Ask anyone what my room looks like–I wouldn’t be able to find matching socks if I tried.
“24 North,” shouted the guard. “Open.”
using the New Releases!!
The design has sat in a box all this time.
See I know what we got to do
Its not a mere coincidence that women make up 70% of the poor population worldwide. Its this whole “I can do this! I got this! I don’t need you” attitude that’s a leading cause. Don’t blame wars, and mistreatment or whatever weak responses I know I’ll get regarding this… Pick up a pair of boxing gloves, a stone, something. Don’t let them take away your kids, beat that soldiers ass! You want to be so empowered learn how to take a punch, and then give a couple more. If you want to be empowered.
My advice as a writer is pretty cut and dry. Take your time. Explore your worlds and your cast. This is not a race to the finish line…unless you want your readers to feel the same way.
Who would have thought
Make an "S" or "figure 8" link and attach it to the center drilled hole at one end of the bracelet.
“I can’t go on any more sweet-heart!” he firmly held her hand. He could feel that dawn was approaching from the position of the stars.
The Landen Meadows neighborhood does have a homeowners association, and neighborhood dues are currently $395 per year. To view the neighborhood covenants click HERE
“Hah! Why does that sound funny? May be because we know each other so well that we even don’t know each other’s name!”, I snapped. Unfortunately, the guy thought I was trying to be funny.
You may write me down in history
Portobello mushrooms stuffed with bacon and goats cheese
For a time it looked like Don’s marriage might also be heading for the exit doors after he misunderstood Megan again, resulting in an argument, then him abandoning her at the roadside. He has opened up to her more than any other woman, so a simple comment about his mother touches a bigger raw nerve. But Megan wants to be more valued at work than just as Don’s wife. She doesn’t want to be taken away and then just be a part of his work, she wants to make some of her decisions. We are getting the impression that although this is Don’s attempt at happiness, with the way the culture is changing, they may just be too far apart in age and taste, something touched upon in the first episode of the season with the party and dance. Don is a little too set in his ways, and when he reacts badly, he’s a bit of a monster i.e. leaving his wife on the roadside in the middle of nowhere. In the end they reconciled, but for how long. Bert Cooper does not have a big role to play in the show these days, but a small moment is a significant one, pointing out to Don that he hasn’t been at work for a while, leading the love life (or something along those lines, I forget exactly what he said). This probably means more grief for Peggy, but what else.
Gerald F. Hardacre, 61, Carlsbad, Calif.
Review by Catheljine Filippo-Kokkeel
Dervla Kirwan – Miss Hartigan
“Far out in the Channel, the Haida’s cutter is slowly making its way home. The men are wet and cold. But with hard tack, water, and malted milk tablets, they are better off than those left at the site of the sinking. Suddenly, on the horizon looms a German mine sweeper thqt changes course and heads directly for the small boat. Darting into a mine field, the men pray the Germans will give up. For a moment it looks as though the vessel is planning to fire on them. It hesitates, then swings around, leaving the survivors to their fate. Every man on that little boat knows their situation is desperate and that the odds are against them.
I'll try to post relevant tweets on this blog periodically.
Five minutes later, Crystal came around to me. She put her hands on my shoulders and leaned in. I kept my eyes closed. She began to sway which really hurt my back, but I wasn't about to stop her. As she swayed she prayed that my prayers would flow like water. I felt like I was on a boat with all the swaying, so it was fitting. When she was finished she moved on to the next person. I sat down to relieve my back (which has been hurting for a week), and I considered leaving.
I am so grateful for this day! And the Champagne is waiting to be opened!
We recorded this on April 8, 1995 from "MTV News: The Week in Rock". They did a segment on how people were feeling one year after Nirvana's frontman Kurt Cobain killed himself.
Logically you have to ask yourself if Jack and the Castaway's were all literally dead and in a literal purgatory, why hasn't Darlton outright stated that? Why haven't they come out, cleared things up and said...'Yes, they are literally dead, have been literally dead and in purgatory and in an afterlife, and the Dharma Initiative, the tests, studies, scientists, Flashes and all the other stuff has nothing to do with seeing literally dead Castaways'. Instead all they have said is that although it is a "spiritual" finale, you can go back and re-watch and/or reach your own conclusions to what you saw. Or you can simply refer back to the Damon Lindelof quote I left for you near the beginning of this post. See, it all comes back around ;)
1948/9 Street Singer (music show made for ABC, Chicago)
Mind restless, and wild.
The cult objects include five standing stones (Massebot), two basalt altars, two pottery libation vessels and two portable shrines. No human or animal figurines were found, suggesting the people of Khirbet Qeiyafa observed the biblical ban on graven images.
I have a huge scrap area at the back just dedicated to Scrapbooking and Classes.
Doctors in Norway were alerted to the possibility of using immune system-inhibiting cancer drugs in 2004 when a patient with both Hodgkin's Lymphoma and ME was given the treatment and her fatigue syndrome improved for five months.
One final thought from Visioneering:
All in all we will make a beautiful mini album, perfect for all your Summer photos. The price of this class will be £12.50 - BUT THAT'S NOT ALL!
"The arguments in the Care Act cases may be funny to Justice Antonin Scalia, the bully that he is, but they aren’t funny to the single father who will avoid bankruptcy because of the law."
As shown above in 1931, the next owners were Walkers of Warrington and by the 1960s the Carlton was a Tetley's house [1]. Burtonwood were next owners in 1993 as shown by Alan Winfield a couple of years later. In its later years it looks like it was a Pub Co concern, and predictably, was allowed to run down before its inevitable closure.
Here are things that leave traces, foxes, frogs, airplanes, children (shadows) beautiful collage work. Good book for younger children to learn a new, more abstract, word. This was loaned by a friend.
The guide also contains an interview with NSA Media’s Karin Kasper, vice president of activation services. Kasper helps lead one of the top buyers of newspaper media in the U.S., and as a member of ABC’s Newspaper Buyers’ Advisory Committee, Kasper has unique insights into the background of the branded edition rules. Her interview with committee member Steve Wagenlander is below.
What do you think? Do these animated renditions have any place in the Star Wars canon? Hate Ewoks, or just Jar-Jar Binks? Let me know in the comments below.
Our DT have come up with some wonderfully varied creations for you for this challenge, thank you ladies!
So this is my current concern. I have drifted so far out on the inscrutible tides that I have lost all grasp on this world. I fear that at any moment my identidy will come rushing back in horror and when it does it will slam me me out like an oncoming truck to the pavement.
Hubby made a yummy Mexican chicken casserole, bread sticks, and peas for dinner – YUM!!! Finally, last night, LooHoo and I took Doodle to Foundations at church and then headed out to Target so she could do some last-minute shopping before her upcoming trip to visit family in Arizona! She got several fun gifts for her cousins and some snacks for the journey. We stopped for coffee and then picked up Doodle and headed home to call it a night.
After the diagnosis, I decided to join a Fitness Challenge which had just started the week prior to my consultation. It was a ten week program dedicated to teaching each week about food & fitness. It was also a weekly weigh in and accountability with a little bonus involved. Everyone of the people who joined put in $35 into a pool of money. The top 3 people who lost the most would get a cut of the pot…
Tokyo Japan
Martha Marshall Controlled chaos. I like to work intuitively and put down layers of interesting surfaces and textures, usually confining them to a uniform square format, each one being its own universe. I know a piece is finished when it looks as if I didn’t participate in its creation. I achieve this by working on multiple pieces at a time, moving from one to another, never staying too long with one piece, in order to keep it spontaneous and keep my left brain from interfering with the process.
I looked up from my spaghetti and meatballs flambé (that's a nice way of saying dinner was burned) and asked, "Sylvania? Where, exactly, is Sylvania?"
Trick or Treating this year was awesome. We got out early and the kids are all old enough were we just had to go walk while they ran from house to house as fast as they could. We went much farther then we have the last couple years so by the end they were wiped out and we were so glad.
Spray muffin tins, heat oven to 375* F. Mix all the wet ingredients with the brown sugar. In a separate bowl, mix all the dry ingredients. Slowly add the dry mixture into the wet mixture and blend together. Fill up muffin tins 3/4 full. I usually sprinkle some oats ontop of muffins before putting them into the oven. Bake for 20 minutes or until toothpick comes out clean. Spray tops with smart balance butter after removing from oven and let cool.
I’ll just mention this real quick as well. From a continuity standpoint, it was kind of odd seeing the new weapons of Gears of War 3 littered around the battlefield. You’ll be able to use Retro Lancers and Sawed Off Shotguns quite a bit in addition to fighting new enemies like Serapedes. Honestly, it’s not a huge deal at all, just something interesting that I noticed considering this stuff didn’t get added in until Gears of War 3.
By the time I was due to take the children to school I knew I couldn't drive the car. Grandma stepped in and by the time she came back I was in pain and vomiting continuously.
The NP expressed amazement at the decision.
To have my love to bed, and to arise;
And that is why I'll forever be in love with Sleeping Beauty.
I cannot write a serious post because I spent the majority of my weekend grading papers, writing a final, and wishing I could teach Composition as well as Intro to Theology. Because some people need a swift kick in the pants about writing.
And then Crash won in 2004 and I realized my film taste ran counter to the Academy’s. Of course, I’d deviated from their picks in the past, but never so decisively. Crash is easily one of the worst films I’ve ever seen, a condescending back-patting by a whitewashed Hollywood crew about what life must be like for all those impoverished “others” down in the valley. (Manolha Dargis beautifully explains the political forces behind its critical laurels.)
After Shi arrived at the capital, he bribed assistants of the Jiuxian princess for an opportunity to see the emperor. The emperor asked his assistants to find more than ten well-educated monks to discuss the principles of Buddhism with Shi. It turned out that Shi was a good debater. He could explain the scriptures, argue the metaphysics and interpret difficult passages. The emperor was impressed by his ability, and gave him gifts, the title of a scholar and an official position in the government. He was highly respected by the emperor as a Buddhist scholar, although he did not really understand the requirements of a cultivator. Thus, he was often embarrassed by real cultivators.
Ocean, who obtained their products from the Swiss company Labo, denied liability. According to Ocean, BOTOX was a weak trade mark which had become generic. It also argued that Allergan had not objected when it registered BOTOINA in Ireland and that it was only after it was launched that the court proceedings were initiated.
One day not long ago I was extremely frustrated with one of my children. The complaining had escalated to the point where it was starting to be difficult to be around this child.
Sweet Mother is updated daily. If you’d like to follow this blog, you can receive an email about it by hitting the “follow” button at the top of the page.
And sit down once again
Let’s look at how Random Acts says it’s going to spend the money it raises:
Preparation method
Sandra is a freelance illustrator based in East London whose work mainly evolves around nature and wildlife and is made up of beautiful detailed sketches, dreamy landscapes, adorable creatures and stunning colour combinations that mix bold pattern with organic form.
In his History of Devotion to the Blessed Virgin Mary in North America, MacLeod tells us that in 1862, of more than eight hundred churches in North America which were dedicated to the Blessed Virgin, 145 were named for the Immaculate Conception. Another count made by Fr. Maynard Geiger, O.F.M., in 1943, shows that out of 4,817 churches and institutions in the United States dedicated to the Blessed Virgin Mary, 637 honor the Immaculate Conception.
Yesterday was PLR day - the day all writers in the UK can find out how much they've earned in Public Lending Rights. There's lots of comparing - did you get more or less than last year? Which was your top earning title? Can we spot any trends? There's grumbling and celebrating, misinformation, conclusions that reveal scant understanding of either maths or the PLR scheme and - most chilling of all - a rush of people who declare it's very nice but a shame they have to spend it all on their tax bill.
I filled a Rapidograph terchnical pen with Liquitex Professional Acrylic ink! (Dioxazine Purple) and set to work. I achieved the watercolor look with the same ink, using a bit of gouache and acrylic paint to fill out the white areas.
I wonder if I’ll be able to go.
Sir Ken Robinson is one of the most highly renowned voices, and critics, in education today. A major theme in his work is the importance of nurturing creativity. Another theme, captured in his book The Element: How Finding Your Passion Changes Everything (2009), is the importance of nurturing one’s passions, and the unfortunate absence of that as a priority in conventional schooling. Of course, all is well for students whose passions align with the school curriculum. The trouble is, the world is much bigger than the scope prescribed by the Ministry of Education. Student-driven learning, during the school day and with the guidance of interested adults, is too rare a part of formal education. Yet this is exactly what we need to instill in them to be successful as adults.
Wedding rings on or off: On
Have a Wonderful Day and Thanks for stopping by!!
This site offers daily Morning and Evening Prayer according to the Book of Common Prayer of The Episcopal Church. Each service includes psalms, one or two Bible lessons, and prayers. This site is timed for the Eastern Hemisphere. We also have a site (see the Blogroll) timed for the West. These two sites offer the same prayers, but a few features differ. Please try them both to see which works better for you.
Enjoy, and fish out.
Which my daughters were not afraid to dance to.
Hail to the God Resident at Delos and at Rome–Rejoice! You are praised!
Feeling REFRESHED ;)
Normally, I get annoyed in the face of endless pretty tutorials to make cute things for babies. It's easy to make small things look cute. I'd like to see the same kind of attention lavished on the older, poutier, youngster.
Jus’ sayin’…
Planned Mileage This Week: 25
An initial rather banal plan for a headquarters building for the Air France company was not developed, but a design for a luxury hotel and conference centre did later win a competition (ahead of an even more radical project from Le Corbusier among others). However both changing tastes and a financial crisis put paid to the project before work could begin. The station was eventually given protected status, and a decision was made to preserve it and transform it into a museum.
2. Your photo and bio will be featured in our newsletter and we will need these within a few days of your acceptance.
Kansas City Star - ‎7 hours ago‎
One of the most important benefits of SDN is that commodity hardware can be used, instead of specialty hardware from specific manufacturers. Removing or relocating devices on the network would involve a few mouse clicks in a GUI rather than physically switching Ethernet cables and reconfiguring all the appropriate network devices. Martin Casado, CTO of Nicira (who is one of the companies developing SDN technologies) said that “we’re virtualizing away this physical fabric, and because now we have a virtual layer, you can do anything you want with it. Because of this virtualization, the network can be fashioned from any and all compatible hardware, and can be controlled, transformed, and secured from a software interface rather than from configuring each device individually.
With apologies for the delay (too busy sampling cigars during this summer :), here are some final pictures of the V AMICIgar day in Naples.
He has been breathing so much better now and his vent settings are minimal. We found out a while back that he had 6 cracked ribs, so that could have been a reason why he was having so many problems before. His only problem now is that he is not eating from a bottle, and continues to count on his NG tube for feedings, and will eventually get a G-tube that he can go home with. He has a PICC line that he gets TPN and LIPIDS through for extra nutrition, but that caused a large blood cot and was pulled today
Statements like ‘BookForce shares an electronic warehouse with partners’ cuts little ice in reality. BookForce describe the company as ‘a global publishing service’ dealing with pre-production, printing and post production services of books. I would like to know specifically what BookForce actually do, and what they contract out to global forces through partnerships and what companies are behind these partnerships. For me, BookForce is a facilitator and provider of publishing services on a small scale in the publishing industry, be that printing books or virtually distributing them. While the company has a marketing sales force for distribution, its focus is primarily through online strategies and direct market selling as opposed to a sales force actively engaging, meeting and gaining shelf space within bookstores.
Harold collects little known baseball facts like the Smithsonian collects dead things—the more obscure the better. And thanks to Harold, whatever he knows, I know it too. When he learns a new fact, he can’t wait to tell me. He especially likes to tell me about errors that professional ballplayers would like to forget—but history books and the internet keeps immortal. I know its Harold’s way of trying to cheer me up, but after I’ve made a colossal error in one of my games, I don’t really appreciate hearing about Bill Buckner’s or Fred Snodgrass’s game-losing errors.
There is just something so powerful when two mothers' hearts love a child. It's a connection that is deep and real. Whenever Laurel and I spend time together, conversation always turns to how perfect our situation is and how thankful we are for each other. Our love for each other is truly something uniquely beautiful.
My interest in stained glass art stems from only two introductory courses I took evenings over 20 years ago. I learned stained glass-making, both by using the easy copper foil technique for small pieces and also the traditional, more difficult use of soldering lead channels and grouting those channels to hold heavy, larger pieces of glass.
She nodded. A faint look of relief replaced the wrinkles on her face. As I ran closer I realized that the woman was Marion from my office.
3. Continue to pray that we would have patience and perseverance as we work through red tape and delays.
